Introduction to Biology

Biology is the scientific study of life and living organisms, encompassing a vast array of fields that explore the structure, function, growth, origin, evolution, and distribution of life forms. It is a natural science with a history that stretches back to the earliest times when humans first began to systematically observe and document the natural world around them. Today, biology is a dynamic and ever-evolving discipline, driven by technological advancements and a deeper understanding of the genetic and molecular basis of life.

Historical Development of Biology

Ancient and Classical Biology

The study of biology can be traced back to ancient civilizations where early humans engaged in practices such as agriculture and medicine, gaining empirical knowledge about plants, animals, and the human body. Ancient Egyptians and Mesopotamians made significant contributions to early biological understanding through their practices in agriculture, animal husbandry, and early medicine.

In ancient Greece, biology began to take a more formal shape as philosophers like Aristotle made systematic observations of the natural world. Aristotle is often considered the "father of biology" due to his extensive work on classifying organisms and his observations on anatomy and physiology. His works laid the foundation for biological studies for centuries.

The Middle Ages and Renaissance

During the Middle Ages, the progress in biological sciences slowed in Europe, but significant advancements continued in the Islamic world. Scholars such as Al-Razi and Ibn Sina made important contributions to medicine and pharmacology, while Al-Jahiz wrote extensively on animal behavior and environmental adaptation.

The Renaissance period marked a revival of interest in the natural sciences in Europe. The invention of the printing press allowed for the wider dissemination of knowledge, and naturalists such as Leonardo da Vinci and Andreas Vesalius made significant contributions to anatomy and physiology. Vesalius's work "De humani corporis fabrica" revolutionized the understanding of human anatomy with detailed and accurate illustrations.

The Scientific Revolution and Enlightenment

The Scientific Revolution of the 16th and 17th centuries brought about significant advancements in biology. The invention of the microscope by Antonie van Leeuwenhoek opened up the microscopic world, revealing the existence of microorganisms and the complexity of cellular structures. Robert Hooke's "Micrographia" further detailed these microscopic observations, including the first recorded observation of cells.

The Enlightenment period saw the development of taxonomy by Carl Linnaeus, who introduced a systematic method for naming and classifying organisms. His binomial nomenclature system is still in use today. During this time, the study of natural history flourished, with explorers like Alexander von Humboldt documenting the biodiversity of previously uncharted regions.

The 19th and 20th Centuries

The 19th century was a period of rapid progress in biology, marked by the development of evolutionary theory by Charles Darwin. Darwin's "On the Origin of Species" introduced the concept of natural selection, providing a unifying theory for the diversity of life. Gregor Mendel's work on heredity in pea plants laid the groundwork for the field of genetics, though it went largely unrecognized until the early 20th century.

The 20th century saw the rise of molecular biology, driven by the discovery of the structure of DNA by James Watson and Francis Crick. This breakthrough led to an understanding of the genetic code and the mechanisms of gene expression. Advances in biotechnology, such as recombinant DNA technology and the Human Genome Project, have revolutionized our ability to study and manipulate genetic material.

Branches of Biology

Biology is a vast and diverse field with numerous branches that focus on different aspects of life and living organisms. Here are some of the main branches:

Molecular Biology

Molecular biology is the study of biological processes at the molecular level, focusing on the structure and function of molecules such as DNA, RNA, and proteins. It explores how genetic information is encoded, replicated, and expressed within cells. Techniques such as polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and gene sequencing are fundamental to molecular biology research.

Genetics

Genetics is the study of heredity and variation in organisms. It examines how traits are passed from one generation to the next through genes and how genetic variation contributes to the diversity of life. Genetics also explores the molecular basis of genetic disorders and the principles of genetic engineering and biotechnology.

Cell Biology

Cell biology, or cytology, is the study of cells, their structure, function, and behavior. It investigates the various organelles within cells, such as the nucleus, mitochondria, and ribosomes, and how these organelles contribute to cellular processes. Understanding cell biology is crucial for research in areas such as cancer, immunology, and developmental biology.

Anatomy and Physiology

Anatomy is the study of the structure of living organisms, while physiology focuses on the function of these structures. Together, these fields explore how the body's systems, organs, and tissues work together to sustain life. Anatomy and physiology are fundamental to the medical sciences, providing the basis for understanding human health and disease.

Ecology

Ecology is the study of interactions between organisms and their environment. It examines how living organisms, including humans, interact with each other and with their physical surroundings. Ecologists study ecosystems, biodiversity, and environmental issues such as climate change and habitat destruction.

Evolutionary Biology

Evolutionary biology explores the processes that drive the diversity and adaptation of life over time. It examines the mechanisms of evolution, such as natural selection, genetic drift, and gene flow, and how these processes have shaped the history of life on Earth. Evolutionary biology provides a framework for understanding the relationships between different species and their evolutionary histories.

Microbiology

Microbiology is the study of microorganisms, including bacteria, viruses, fungi, and protozoa. It investigates the biology of these organisms, their roles in ecosystems, and their impacts on human health. Microbiology is essential for fields such as medicine, agriculture, and biotechnology, where microorganisms play crucial roles.

Botany

Botany is the study of plants, including their physiology, structure, genetics, ecology, distribution, and classification. Botanists explore plant life from the cellular level to entire ecosystems, studying processes such as photosynthesis, growth, and reproduction. Botany is vital for understanding agriculture, forestry, and environmental conservation.

Zoology

Zoology is the study of animals, their behavior, physiology, anatomy, and classification. Zoologists investigate the biology of various animal species, their interactions with each other and their environments, and their roles in ecosystems. Zoology encompasses a wide range of subfields, including entomology (the study of insects), herpetology (the study of reptiles and amphibians), and ornithology (the study of birds).

Biotechnology

Biotechnology involves the application of biological knowledge and techniques to develop products and technologies for various purposes. It includes areas such as genetic engineering, bioprocessing, and the development of pharmaceuticals, biofuels, and genetically modified organisms (GMOs). Biotechnology has significant implications for medicine, agriculture, and industry.

Key Concepts and Principles

Biology encompasses a wide range of concepts and principles that are essential for understanding the diversity and complexity of life. Here are some of the most important ones:

Cell Theory

Cell theory is one of the foundational principles of biology. It states that all living organisms are composed of one or more cells, that the cell is the basic unit of life, and that all cells arise from pre-existing cells. This theory emphasizes the importance of cells as the fundamental building blocks of life.

Gene Theory

Gene theory is the principle that genetic information is encoded in DNA (or RNA in some viruses) and that this information is transmitted from one generation to the next. Genes are the basic units of heredity and are responsible for guiding the development and function of organisms. The understanding of genes and their regulation is central to genetics and molecular biology.

Evolution by Natural Selection

The theory of evolution by natural selection, proposed by Charles Darwin, is a cornerstone of biology. It explains how species evolve over time through the differential survival and reproduction of individuals with advantageous traits. Natural selection acts on genetic variation within populations, leading to adaptation and the emergence of new species.

Homeostasis

Homeostasis is the concept that living organisms maintain a stable internal environment despite changes in external conditions. This involves the regulation of physiological processes such as temperature, pH, and electrolyte balance. Homeostasis is essential for the survival and functioning of organisms, ensuring that their internal conditions remain within optimal ranges.

Energy Flow and Metabolism

Metabolism refers to the chemical reactions that occur within organisms to sustain life. These reactions involve the transformation of energy and matter, enabling growth, reproduction, and maintenance of cellular functions. Metabolism is divided into two main categories: anabolism (the synthesis of complex molecules) and catabolism (the breakdown of complex molecules). The flow of energy through metabolic pathways is a fundamental aspect of biology.

Structure and Function

The principle of structure and function states that the structure of a biological molecule, cell, or organism is closely related to its function. For example, the unique shape of an enzyme allows it to catalyze specific chemical reactions, and the structure of the human heart enables it to pump blood effectively. Understanding the relationship between structure and function is key to many areas of biological research.

Ecosystem Dynamics

Ecosystems are complex networks of interacting organisms and their physical environments. The dynamics of ecosystems involve the flow of energy and nutrients through trophic levels, the cycling of matter, and the interactions between species. Ecologists study these dynamics to understand how ecosystems function, how they respond to changes, and how they can be conserved and managed.

Applications of Biology

Biology is not only a theoretical discipline but also a practical one, with applications in various fields that impact our daily lives. Here are some key areas where biology plays a crucial role:

Medicine and Healthcare

Biology is the foundation of medicine and healthcare, providing the knowledge needed to understand the human body, diagnose diseases, and develop treatments. Advances in molecular biology and genetics have led to breakthroughs in personalized medicine, where treatments are tailored to an individual's genetic makeup. Biomedical research has also led to the development of new drugs, vaccines, and therapies,Biology is crucial for numerous reasons, ranging from its role in understanding life processes to its applications in various fields, including medicine, agriculture, ecology, and biotechnology. 
Here are several key reasons why biology is important:1. **Understanding Life**: Biology is the study of life and living organisms, providing insights into the fundamental processes that govern living systems. It explores the structure, function, behavior, evolution, and interactions of organisms, from microscopic bacteria to complex ecosystems, enabling us to understand the diversity and complexity of life on Earth.2. **Advancing Medicine**: Biology plays a central role in healthcare and medicine, from diagnosing and treating diseases to developing new therapies and medical technologies. It provides the foundation for understanding human anatomy, physiology, genetics, and biochemistry, leading to breakthroughs in areas such as pharmacology, immunology, genetics, and regenerative medicine.3. **Improving Agriculture**: Biology is essential for enhancing agricultural productivity, food security, and sustainability. It encompasses the study of plant and animal biology, genetics, ecology, and soil science, enabling the development of crop varieties with higher yields, resistance to pests and diseases, and improved nutritional content. Biotechnological tools, such as genetic engineering and precision agriculture, further contribute to agricultural innovation and sustainability.4. **Conserving Biodiversity**: Biology informs conservation efforts aimed at preserving biodiversity and ecosystems. It provides insights into the ecological roles of species, the dynamics of ecosystems, and the impacts of human activities on the environment. By understanding the interconnectedness of species and habitats, biologists work to protect endangered species, restore ecosystems, and mitigate the effects of climate change and habitat destruction.5. **Understanding Evolution**: Biology elucidates the principles of evolution, which underlie the diversity of life and the adaptation of organisms to their environments. Evolutionary biology explores the mechanisms of natural selection, genetic variation, and speciation, providing a framework for understanding the evolutionary history of species and predicting future changes in response to environmental pressures.6. **Addressing Global Challenges**: Biology contributes to addressing pressing global challenges, including climate change, infectious diseases, pollution, and environmental degradation. Through research in areas such as ecology, microbiology, epidemiology, and biotechnology, biologists develop strategies for mitigating the impacts of these challenges and promoting environmental sustainability and human health.7. **Informing Public Policy**: Biology provides essential knowledge and evidence that inform public policy decisions related to health, environmental protection, food safety, and biotechnology regulation. Biologists contribute expertise to policymaking processes, providing scientific data, risk assessments, and recommendations to policymakers and stakeholders.8. **Inspiring Scientific Inquiry**: Biology inspires curiosity about the natural world and encourages scientific inquiry and discovery. It invites individuals to explore the wonders of life, from the intricate structures of cells to the complexity of ecosystems, fostering a sense of wonder and appreciation for the beauty and diversity of living organisms.In summary, biology is important because it enhances our understanding of life processes, advances medicine and agriculture, conserves biodiversity, addresses global challenges, informs public policy, and inspires scientific curiosity and discovery. It is a foundational science that underpins many aspects of human society and has profound implications for the future of life on Earth.   blood
abdomen
the region of the body between the thorax and the pelvis
 abiogenesis
a hypothetical organic phenomenon by which living organisms are created from nonliving matter
 absorption
a process in which one substance permeates another
 activation energy
the energy that an atomic system must acquire before a process (such as an emission or reaction) can occur
 active transport
transport of a substance (as a protein or drug) across a cell membrane against the concentration gradient; requires an expenditure of energy
 allele
any of the forms of a gene that can occupy the same locus
 alternation of generations
the alternation of two or more different forms in the life cycle of a plant or animal
 anabolism
the synthesis in living organisms of more complex substances (e.g., living tissue) from simpler ones together with the storage of energy
 antibiotic
a substance used to kill microorganisms and cure infections
 antigen
any substance that stimulates an immune response in the body
 appendicular skeleton
the part of the skeleton that includes the pectoral girdle and the pelvic girdle and the upper and lower limbs
 asexual reproduction
reproduction without the fusion of gametes
 atrium
a chamber connected to other chambers or passageways
 axial skeleton
the part of the skeleton that includes the skull and spinal column and sternum and ribs
 bilateral symmetry
the property of being symmetrical about a vertical plane
 bile
a digestive juice secreted by the liver
 biomass
the total amount of living matter in a given unit area
 biome
major ecological community with distinct climate and flora
 biosynthesis
production of a chemical compound by a living organism
 bivalve
a sea creature with two connected hinged shells
 bone marrow
the fatty network of connective tissue that fills the cavities of bones
 botany
the branch of biology that studies plants
 catabolism
breakdown in living organisms of more complex substances into simpler ones together with release of energy
 catalyst
substance that initiates or accelerates a chemical reaction
 cell wall
a rigid layer of polysaccharides enclosing a plant membrane
 cellulose
a polysaccharide that is the chief constituent of all plant tissues and fibers
 centromere
a specialized condensed region of each chromosome that appears during mitosis where the chromatids are held together to form an X shape
 cerebellum
a major division of the vertebrate brain
 cerebrum
anterior part of the brain consisting of two hemispheres
 chemical change
process determined by substances' composition and structure
 chitin
component of arthropods' exoskeletons and bodies of fungi
 chlorophyll
any of green pigments found in photosynthetic organisms
 chloroplast
organelle in which photosynthesis takes place
 chromatin
the readily stainable substance of a cell nucleus consisting of DNA and RNA and various proteins; during mitotic division it condenses into chromosomes
 chromosome
a threadlike strand of DNA that carries genes
 circulatory system
the organs and tissues involved in circulating blood and lymph through the body
 codon
a specific sequence of three adjacent nucleotides on a strand of DNA or RNA that specifies the genetic code information for synthesizing a particular amino acid
 cohesion
the state of sticking together
 commensalism
when one organism benefits from another without damaging it
 community
a group of people living in a particular local area
 compound eye
in insects and some crustaceans: composed of many light-sensitive elements each forming a portion of an image
 concentration
the spatial property of being crowded together
 conjugation
the state of being joined together
 cotyledon
embryonic leaf in seed-bearing plants
 cytology
the branch of biology that studies the structure and function of cells
 cytolysis
pathological breakdown of cells by the destruction of their outer membrane
 cytoplasm
the substance inside a cell, not including the nucleus
 cytoskeleton
a microscopic network of actin filaments and microtubules in the cytoplasm of many living cells that gives the cell shape and coherence
 deciduous plant
a plant having foliage that is shed annually at the end of the growing season
 diffusion
the act of dispersing something
 digestion
the process by which the body breaks down food
 dihybrid cross
hybridization using two traits with two alleles each
 dominant allele
an allele that produces the same phenotype whether its paired allele is identical or different
 ecology
the environment as it relates to living organisms
 ecosystem
organisms interacting with their physical environment
 ectoplasm
the thin, watery outer layer of a cell
 ectothermic
of animals except birds and mammals
 element
a substance that cannot be separated into simpler substances
 endoplasm
the inner portion of the gelatinous liquid inside a cell
 endoskeleton
the internal skeleton; bony and cartilaginous structure
 endospore
a small asexual spore that develops inside the cell of some bacteria and algae
 endothermic
occurring or formed with absorption of heat
 epidermis
the outer layer of skin covering the body surface
 epithelium
membranous tissue covering internal organs and other internal surfaces of the body
 excretion
the bodily process of discharging waste matter
 exoskeleton
the exterior protective or supporting structure or shell of many animals (especially invertebrates) including bony or horny parts such as nails or scales or hoofs
 eyespot
an eyelike marking
 fermentation
breaking down an organic substance, as sugar into alcohol
 flagellate
whip or scourge; punish as if by whipping
 foot
the pedal extremity of vertebrates other than human beings
 fruit
the ripened reproductive body of a seed plant
 gemmule
the physically discrete element that Darwin proposed as responsible for heredity
 gene
part of DNA controlling physical characteristics and growth
 genetics
the study of heredity and variation in organisms
 genotype
the particular alleles present in an organism
 gestation
the period during which an embryo develops
 gonad
a gland in which gametes (sex cells) are produced
 greenhouse effect
warming due to solar radiation trapped by the atmosphere
 haustorium
a root-like attachment in parasitic plants that penetrates and obtains food from the host
 hermaphroditic
of animal or plant
 hibernation
the resting state in which some animals pass the winter
 holdfast
restraint that attaches to something or holds something in place
 homeostasis
metabolic equilibrium maintained by biological mechanisms
 hydrogen bond
a chemical bond consisting of a hydrogen atom between two electronegative atoms (e.g., oxygen or nitrogen) with one side be a covalent bond and the other being an ionic bond
 hydrolysis
a chemical reaction in which water reacts with a compound to produce other compounds; involves the splitting of a bond and the addition of the hydrogen cation and the hydroxide anion from the water
 hydrophobic
lacking affinity for water
 hypha
any of the threadlike filaments forming the mycelium of a fungus
 hypothesis
a tentative insight that is not yet verified or tested
 inheritance
hereditary succession to a title or an office or property
 isotonic solution
a solution having the same osmotic pressure as blood
 karyotype
the appearance of the chromosomal makeup of a somatic cell in an individual or species (including the number and arrangement and size and structure of the chromosomes)
 loam
a rich soil consisting of sand, clay and organic materials
 lysosome
a membrane-bound organelle containing digestive enzymes
 macroevolution
evolution on a large scale extending over geologic era and resulting in the formation of new taxonomic groups
 mantle
a sleeveless garment like a cloak but shorter
 matter
that which has mass and occupies space
 medulla oblongata
lower or hindmost part of the brain
 medusa
one of two forms that coelenterates take: it is the free-swimming sexual phase in the life cycle of a coelenterate; in this phase it has a gelatinous umbrella-shaped body and tentacles
 meiosis
cell division that produces reproductive cells
 membrane
a sheet of tissue that lines or connects organs or cells
 mesenchyme
mesodermal tissue that forms connective tissue and blood and smooth muscles
 messenger RNA
the template for protein synthesis
 metabolism
the organic processes that are necessary for life
 microevolution
evolution resulting from small specific genetic changes that can lead to a new subspecies
 mitosis
the process by which a cell divides into two new cells
 model
a representation of something, often on a smaller scale
 molt
cast off hair, skin, horn, or feathers
 monohybrid cross
hybridization using a single trait with two alleles
 mother cell
cell from which another cell of an organism develops
 mutation
a change or alteration in form or qualities
 mutualism
the relation between two organisms that benefit each other
 mycelium
the vegetative part of a fungus consisting of a mass of branching threadlike hyphae
 nervous system
the sensory and control apparatus consisting of a network of nerve cells
 neurotoxin
any toxin that affects neural tissues
 notochord
a flexible rodlike structure that forms the supporting axis of the body in the lowest chordates and lowest vertebrates and in embryos of higher vertebrates
 nucleus
a part of the cell responsible for growth and reproduction
 osmosis
diffusion of molecules through a semipermeable membrane
 paleontology
the earth science that studies fossil organisms
 parasite
an animal or plant that lives in or on a host
 parasitism
when one organism benefits from another by causing damage
 passive transport
transport of a substance across a cell membrane by diffusion
 pathogen
any disease-producing agent
 pedigree
the ancestry or lineage of an individual
 pellicle
thin protective membrane in some protozoa
 peptide bond
the primary linkage of all protein structures
 phagocytosis
process in which phagocytes engulf and digest microorganisms and cellular debris; an important defense against infection
 phase
any distinct time period in a sequence of events
 phenotype
observable characteristics produced by genes and environment
 phloem
plant tissue that conducts synthesized food substances
 phospholipid
any of various compounds composed of fatty acids and phosphoric acid and a nitrogenous base; an important constituent of membranes
 photosynthesis
formation of compounds in plants aided by radiant energy
 phototropism
an organism's orienting response to light
 physical change
a change from one state (solid or liquid or gas) to another without a change in chemical composition
 physiology
the science dealing with the functioning of organisms
 phytoplankton
photosynthetic or plant constituent of plankton
 placenta
the vascular structure in the uterus of most mammals providing oxygen and nutrients for and transferring wastes from the developing fetus
 plankton
aggregate of small organisms that float or drift in water
 plasma membrane
a thin membrane enclosing the cytoplasm of a cell
 plasmid
a small cellular inclusion consisting of a ring of DNA that is not in a chromosome but is capable of autonomous replication
 pollen
fine spores produced by flowers to fertilize other flowers
 pollination
transfer of the fine spores that contain male gametes
 polyp
a small vascular growth on the surface of a mucous membrane
 population
the people who inhabit a territory or state
 pseudopod
temporary outgrowth of a cell used for locomotion or feeding
 radial symmetry
the property of symmetry about an axis
 recessive allele
an allele that produces its characteristic phenotype only when its paired allele is identical
 regeneration
the act of forming again; renewing and reconstituting
 reproduction
the act of making copies
 respiration
a single complete act of breathing in and out
 saprophyte
an organism that feeds on dead organic matter especially a fungus or bacterium
 secretion
the organic process of releasing some substance
 seed
small, hard part of a plant from which a new plant can grow
 semipermeable membrane
a membrane (as a cell membrane) that allows some molecules to pass through but not others
 sexual reproduction
reproduction involving the union or fusion of a male and a female gamete
 shell
the outer covering of an animal
 simple eye
an eye having a single lens
 species
taxonomic group whose members can interbreed
 spore
a small usually single-celled asexual reproductive body produced by many nonflowering plants and fungi and some bacteria and protozoans and that are capable of developing into a new individual without sexual fusion
 sporophore
a spore-bearing branch or organ: the part of the thallus of a sporophyte that develops spores; in ferns and mosses and liverworts is practically equivalent to the sporophyte
 stolon
a horizontal branch from the base of plant that produces new plants from buds at its tips
 symbiosis
the relation between two interdependent species of organisms
 taxonomy
a classification of organisms based on similarities
 thallus
a plant body without true stems or roots or leaves or vascular system; characteristic of the thallophytes
 theory
a belief that can guide behavior
 thorax
the body of an arthropod between the head and the abdomen
 transduction
the process whereby a transducer accepts energy in one form and gives back related energy in a different form
 transformation
the act of changing in form or shape or appearance
 translocation
the transport of dissolved material within a plant
 transpiration
the emission of water vapor from the leaves of plants
 univalve
used of mollusks, especially gastropods, as snails etc.
 vaccine
injection of weakened or dead microbes to create antibodies
 vacuole
a tiny cavity filled with fluid in the cytoplasm of a cell
 ventricle
a chamber of the heart that receives blood from an atrium
 virus
infectious agent that replicates itself within living hosts
 watershed
a ridge of land that separates two adjacent river systems
 xylem
plant tissue that conducts water and dissolved nutrients
 zooplankton
animal constituent of plankton
 zygospore
a plant spore formed by two similar sexual cells
 zygote
a fertilized egg
absorption
(physiology) A process in which one substance permeates another. A fluid permeates or is dissolved by a liquid or solid. Skin absorption is a route by which substances can enter the body through the skin.
acclimatization
(physiology) Adaptation to a new climate, as with a new temperature or altitude or environment.
acetyl-CoA
(biochemistry) Acetyl coenzyme A is a molecule participating in many biochemical reactions in carbohydrate, protein and lipid metabolism. Its main function is to deliver the acetyl group to the citric acid cycle (Krebs cycle) to be oxidized for energy production.
acoelomate
(zoology) A type of animal, such as a flatworm, with a body plan that lacks a fluid-filled cavity between the body wall and the digestive tract. Rather, semi-solid mesodermal tissues between the gut and body wall hold the animal's organs in place. Contrast coelomate and pseudocoelomate.
adaptation
(evolutionary biology, population biology) Term can apply to an individual organism's adaptation to its environment, the adaptation of organisms to an environment through evolutionary processes, or the population dynamics intrisic to the evolutionary process.
adenine
(biochemistry) A purine-derived organic compound which is one of the four canonical nucleobases used in the nucleic acids DNA and RNA. Its derivatives are involved in a wide variety of biochemical reactions, including cellular respiration.
aerobic
Capable of surviving and growing in the presence of oxygen.
amino acid
(biochemistry) A class of organic compounds containing an amine group and a carboxylic acid group which function as the fundamental building blocks of proteins and play important roles in many other biochemical processes.
anaerobic
Any organism that does not require molecular oxygen for growth.
animal
Any member of a clade of multicellular eukaryotic organisms belonging to the biological kingdom Animalia. With few exceptions, animals consume organic material, breathe oxygen, are able to move, reproduce sexually, and grow from a blastula during embryonic development. An estimated 7 million distinct animal species currently exist.
antibiotic
Also called an antibacterial.

A type of antimicrobial drug used in the treatment and prevention of bacterial infections.
Archaea
One of the three recognized domains of organisms, the other two being Bacteria and Eukaryota.
artificial selection
Also called selective breeding.

The process by which humans use animal breeding and plant breeding to selectively control the development of particular phenotypic traits in organisms by choosing which individual organisms will reproduce and create offspring. While the deliberate exploitation of knowledge about genetics and reproductive biology in the hope of producing desirable characteristics is widely practiced in agriculture and experimental biology, artificial selection may also be unintentional and may produce unintended (desirable or undesirable) results.
asexual reproduction
A type of reproduction involving a single parent that results in offspring that are genetically identical to the parent.
astrobiology
The branch of biology concerned with the effects of outer space on living organisms and the search for extraterrestrial life.
autoimmunity
The system of immune responses of an organism directed against its own healthy cells and tissues.
autotroph
Sometimes used interchangeably with primary producer.

An organism capable of producing complex organic compounds from simple substances present in its surroundings, generally by using energy from sunlight (as in photosynthesis) or from inorganic chemical reactions (as in chemosynthesis). Autotrophs do not need to consume another living organism in order to obtain energy or organic carbon, as opposed to heterotrophs.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
B
B cell
A type of lymphocyte in the humoral immunity of the adaptive immune system.
bacteria
An enormous and diverse clade of microscopic, prokaryotic, single-celled organisms which lack a true nucleus. They represent one of the three fundamental biological domains.
bacteriophage
A virus that infects and multiplies within bacteria.
Barr body
The inactive X chromosome in a female somatic cell, rendered inactive in a process called lyonization, in those species in which sex is determined by the presence of the Y chromosome (including humans) or W chromosome rather than by the presence of two X chromosomes or two Z chromosomes.
basal body
An organelle formed from a centriole, and a short cylindrical array of microtubules. Also called a basal granule, a kinetosome, and in older cytological literature, a blepharoplast.
behavioral ecology
The study of the evolutionary basis for animal behavior due to ecological pressures.
bile
A dark green to yellowish-brown fluid, produced by the liver of most vertebrates, which aids the digestion of lipids in the small intestine. Also called gall.
binary fission
The process by which one prokaryotic cell divides into two identical daughter cells.
binomial nomenclature
A formal system of classifying species of living things by giving each a name composed of two parts, both of which use Latin grammatical forms, although they can be based on words from other languages.
biocatalysis
The process of catalysis in biological systems. In biocatalytic processes, natural catalysts, such as protein enzymes, perform chemical transformations on organic compounds.
biochemistry
The branch of biology that studies the chemical properties, compositions, reactions, and processes related to living organisms.
biodiversity
A contraction of "biological diversity" generally referring to the variety and variability of life on Earth.
bioengineering
The application of concepts and methods of biology to solve real-world problems related to the life sciences or the application thereof.
bioenergetics
The study of the transformation of energy within and between living organisms.
biogeography
The study of the distribution of species and ecosystems in geographic space and through geological time. Organisms and biological communities often vary in a regular fashion along geographic gradients of latitude, elevation, isolation and habitat area.
bioinformatics
The application of computer technology to the management of biological information.
biological organization
The hierarchy of complex biological structures and systems, designed to define life through a reductionist approach.
biology
The scientific study of life.
biomass
Organic matter derived from living or recently living organisms. Biomass can be used as a source of energy and it most often refers to plants or plant-based materials which are not used for food or feed, and are specifically called lignocellulosic biomass.
biomathematics
The theoretical use of mathematical models and abstractions of living systems to understand and predict biological problems.
biome
Any very large ecological area on the Earth's surface containing fauna and flora (animals and plants) adapting to their environment. Biomes are often defined by abiotic factors such as climate, topographical relief, geology, soils, and water resources.
biomechanics
The study of the structure and function of biological systems by means of the methods of "mechanics", which is the branch of physics involving analysis of the actions of forces.
biomedical engineering
The application of engineering principles and design concepts to medicine and biology for healthcare purposes (e.g. diagnostic or therapeutic).
biomedical research
The pursuit of answers to medical questions. These investigations lead to discoveries, which in turn lead to the development of new preventions, therapies, and cures for problems in human and veterinary health. Biomedical research generally takes two forms: basic science and applied research.
biomolecule
Molecules and ions that are present in organisms, essential to some typically biological process such as cell division, morphogenesis, or development.
biophysics
The application of approaches traditionally employed in physics to study biological systems.
biosynthesis
biotechnology
Biotechnology is the use of living systems and organisms to develop or make products, or "any technological application that uses biological systems, living organisms or derivatives thereof, to make or modify products or processes for specific use" (UN Convention on Biological Diversity).
bipedal
A form of terrestrial locomotion where an organism moves by means of its two rear limbs or legs.
birth
blastocyst
A mammalian blastula in which some differentiation of cells has occurred.
blood
A body fluid that circulates in humans and other vertebrate animals and is generally responsible for delivering necessary substances such as oxygen and nutrients between the cells and tissues of the body and transporting metabolic waste products away from those same cells and tissues.
blood–brain barrier
A semipermeable membrane separating the blood from the cerebrospinal fluid, and constituting a barrier to the passage of cells, particles, and large molecules.
botany
The branch of biology that studies plants.
building biology
A science that leads to natural healthy ecological homes, schools, and workplaces that exist in harmony with the environment.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
C
Calvin cycle
Also called the biosynthetic phase, light-independent reactions, dark reactions, or photosynthetic carbon reduction (PCR) cycle.

A series of chemical reactions which occurs as one of two primary phases of photosynthesis, specifically the phase in which carbon dioxide and other compounds are converted into simple carbohydrates such as glucose. These reactions occur in the stroma, the fluid-filled area of the chloroplast outside the thylakoid membranes. In the Calvin cycle, the products of previous light-dependent reactions (ATP and NADPH) undergo further reactions which do not require the presence of light and which can be broadly divided into three stages: carbon fixation, reduction reactions, and ribulose 1,5-bisphosphate (RuBP) regeneration.[1]
carbon fixation
Also called carbon assimilation.

The process by which inorganic carbon, particularly in the form of carbon dioxide, is converted to organic compounds by living organisms. Examples include photosynthesis and chemosynthesis.
carbonate
Any member of two classes of chemical compounds derived from carbonic acid or carbon dioxide.
carotenoid
One of a class of organic pigments produced by algae and plants, as well as certain bacteria and fungi.
catalase
An enzyme found in nearly all living organisms exposed to oxygen, including bacteria, plants, and animals.
cell
The basic structural and functional unit of all living organisms, and the smallest functional unit of life. A cell may exist as an independent, self-replicating unit (as in the case of unicellular organisms), or in cooperation with other cells, each of which may be specialized for carrying out particular functions within a larger multicellular organism. Cells consist of cytoplasm enclosed within a cell membrane and sometimes a cell wall, and serve the fundamental purpose of separating the controlled environment in which biochemical processes take place from the outside world. Most cells are visible only under a microscope.
cell biology
Also called cytology.

The branch of biology that studies the structure and function of living cells, including their physiological properties, metabolic processes, chemical composition, life cycle, the organelles they contain, and their interactions with their environment. This is done at both microscopic and molecular levels.
cell cycle
The ordered series of events which take place in a cell leading to duplication of its genetic material and ultimately the division of the cytoplasm and organelles to produce two or more daughter cells. These events can be broadly divided into phases of growth and division, each of which can vary in duration and complexity depending on the tissue or organism to which the cell belongs. Cell cycles are essential processes in all unicellular and multicellular organisms.
cell division
Any process by which a parent cell divides into two or more daughter cells. Examples include binary fission, mitosis, and meiosis.
cell membrane
The semipermeable membrane surrounding the cytoplasm of a cell.
cell nucleus
The "control room" for the cell. The nucleus gives out all the orders.
cell plate
Grown in the cell's center, it fuses with the parental plasma membrane, creating a new cell wall that enables cell division.
cell theory
The theory that all living things are made up of cells.
cell wall
A tough, often rigid structural barrier surrounding certain types of cells (such as in fungi, plants, and most prokaryotes) that is immediately external to the cell membrane.
cellular
Of or relating to a cell.
central dogma of molecular biology
A framework for understanding the movement of genetic information between information-carrying biopolymers within biological systems. Popularly (though simplistically) stated as "DNA makes RNA and RNA makes protein", the principle attempts to capture the notion that the transfer of genetic information only naturally occurs between certain classes of molecules and in certain directions.
centriole
A cylindrical cell structure found in most eukaryotic cells, composed mainly of a protein called tubulin.
centrosome
An organelle that is the primary site at which microtubules are organized. They occur only in plant and animal cells and help to regulate cell division.
chemical compound
A chemical substance consisting of two or more different chemically bonded elements, with a fixed ratio determining the composition. The ratio of each element is usually expressed by a chemical formula.
chemical equilibrium
The state in which both reactants and products are present in concentrations which have no further tendency to change with time in a chemical reaction.
chemical reaction
A process that leads to the transformation of one set of chemical substances to another.
chemistry
A branch of the physical sciences that studies the composition, structure, properties, and change of matter. Chemical interactions underlie all biological processes.
chemosynthesis
chlorophyll
Any of several photosynthetic pigments found in cyanobacteria, algae, or plants.
chloroplast
A type of highly specialized organelle in the cells of plants and algae, the main role of which is to conduct photosynthesis, by which the photosynthetic pigment chlorophyll captures the energy from sunlight and converts and stores it in the molecules ATP and NADPH while freeing oxygen from water.
cholesterol
A type of lipid molecule that is biosynthesized by all animal cells because it is an essential structural component of animal cell membranes, essential for maintaining both membrane structural integrity and fluidity.
chromosome
A threadlike strand of DNA in the cell nucleus that carries the genes in a linear order.
cilia
circadian rhythm
citric acid cycle
Also called the Krebs cycle and tricarboxylic acid cycle (TCA).

A series of chemical reactions used by all aerobic organisms to generate energy through the oxidation of acetyl-CoA derived from carbohydrates, fats, and proteins into carbon dioxide and chemical energy in the form of guanosine triphosphate (GTP). In addition, the cycle provides the chemical precursors for certain amino acids as well as the reducing agent NADH that is used in numerous other biochemical reactions. Its central importance to many biochemical pathways suggests that it was one of the earliest established components of cellular metabolism and may have originated abiogenically.
clade
class
clonal selection
A scientific theory in immunology that explains the functions of cells (lymphocytes) of the immune system in response to specific antigens invading the body. The theory has become the widely accepted model for how the immune system responds to infection and how certain types of B and T lymphocytes are selected for destruction of specific antigens.[2]
cloning
The process of producing individual organisms or molecules with identical or virtually identical DNA, either naturally or artificially. Many organisms, such as bacteria, insects, and plants, are capable of naturally producing clones through asexual reproduction. In biotechnology, cloning refers to the artificial creation of copies of cells, DNA fragments, or other biomolecules by various laboratory techniques.
coat, coating
In the context of virus capsid, may refer colloquially to the defined geometric structure of a capsid, or the membrane of an endosome containing an intact virion. The coat of a virus is used in descriptions for the general public. Related slang: uncoating.
colony
comparative biology
The use of comparative methods to study the similarities and differences between two or more biological organisms (e.g. two organisms from the same time period but different taxa, or two organisms from the same taxon but different times in evolutionary history). The side-by-side comparison of morphological or molecular characteristics of different organisms is the basis from which biologists infer the organisms' genetic relatedness and their natural histories. It is a fundamental tool in many biological disciplines, including anatomy, physiology, paleontology, and phylogenetics.
conservation biology
The scientific study of nature and of Earth's biodiversity with the aim of protecting species, their habitats, and ecosystems from excessive rates of extinction and the erosion of biotic interactions.
convergent evolution
An evolutionary process by which species of different lineages independently develop similar characteristics, often to the point that the species appear to be more closely related than they actually are.
countercurrent exchange
The crossover of some property, usually heat or some component, between two fluids flowing in opposite directions to each other. The phenomenon occurs naturally but is also frequently mimicked in industry and engineering.
crista
A fold in the inner membrane of a mitochondrion.
cryobiology
The branch of biology that studies the effects of low temperatures on living things within Earth's cryosphere or in laboratory experiments.
cytology
See cell biology.
cytoplasm
All of the material within a cell and enclosed by the cell membrane, except for the nucleus. The cytoplasm consists mainly of water, the gel-like cytosol, various organelles, and free-floating granules of nutrients and other biomolecules.
cytosine
One of the four main nitrogenous bases found in both DNA and RNA, along with adenine, guanine, thymine, and uracil (in RNA); it is a pyrimidine derivative, with a heterocyclic aromatic ring and two substituents attached (an amine group at position 4 and a keto group at position 2).
cytoskeleton
A complex, dynamic network of interlinking protein filaments that extends from the cell nucleus to the cell membrane and which is present in the cytoplasm of all cells, including bacteria and archaea.[3] The cytoskeletal systems of different organisms are composed of similar proteins. In eukaryotes, the cytoskeletal matrix is a dynamic structure composed of three main proteins, which are capable of rapid growth or disassembly dependent on the cell's requirements.[4]
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
D
Darwinian fitness
The genetic contribution of an individual to the next generation's gene pool relative to the average for the population, usually measured by the number of offspring or close kin that survive to reproductive age.
deciduous
Deciduous means "falling off at maturity" or "tending to fall off", and it is typically used in botany in order to refer to trees or shrubs that lose their leaves seasonally (most commonly during autumn) and to the shedding of other plant structures such as petals after flowering or fruits when ripe.
decomposition
The process by which the organic compounds of deceased organisms are broken down into simpler organic or inorganic matter such as carbon dioxide, water, simple sugars, and mineral salts. These reactions occur naturally by both biotic means (biodegradation, such as that practiced by many bacteria and fungi) and abiotic means (basic physical and chemical processes, such as hydrolysis). Decomposition recycles matter present in the biosphere, making it an essential part of the nutrient cycle. Organisms that facilitate decomposition are known as decomposers; the scientific study of decomposition is known as taphonomy.
decomposer
Any organism that facilitates the breakdown of dead or decaying organisms by carrying out the decomposition of complex biomolecules into simpler substances. Decomposers are heterotrophs which obtain energy and nutrition for their own growth and reproduction by recycling the chemical compounds contained in organic substrates. Microorganisms such as bacteria and fungi are the biosphere's chief decomposers, but invertebrates such as earthworms are also sometimes considered decomposers.
dehydration reaction
A chemical reaction that involves the loss of a water molecule from the reacting molecule.
denaturation
A process in which proteins or nucleic acids lose the quaternary, tertiary, and secondary structure which is present in their native state, when exposed to some external stress or chemical compound such as a strong acid or base, a concentrated inorganic salt, or an organic solvent.
dendrite
A short branched extension of a nerve cell, along which impulses received from other cells at synapses are transmitted to the cell body.
denitrification
The microbially facilitated process of nitrate reduction that ultimately produces molecular nitrogen (N2) through a series of intermediate gaseous nitrogen oxide products. It is performed by a large group of heterotrophic facultative anaerobic bacteria and is a fundamental component of the nitrogen cycle.
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA)
A nucleic acid polymer that serves as the fundamental hereditary material in all living organisms. Each DNA molecule is composed of long sequences of nucleotides, each of which includes one of four nitrogenous bases – adenine (abbreviated A), cytosine (C), guanine (G), and thymine (T) – attached to a sugar-phosphate complex which acts as a "backbone" for the long-chain polymer. DNA most commonly occurs in "double-stranded" form, i.e. as a pair of nucleotide polymers bound together by complementary base pairing.
depolarization
The process of reversing the charge across a cell membrane (such as that of a neuron), thereby causing an action potential. In depolarization, the inside of the membrane, which is normally negatively charged, becomes positive and the outside becomes negative. This is brought about by positively charged sodium ions rapidly passing into the axon.
desmosome
Also called the macula adhaerens.

A cell structure specialized for cell-to-cell adhesion.
developmental biology
The branch of biology that studies the processes by which living organisms grow and develop over time. The field may also encompass the study of reproduction, regeneration, metamorphosis, and the growth and differentiation of stem cells in mature tissues.
disease
Any particular abnormal condition that negatively affects the structure or function of all or part of a living organism and that is not the result of any immediate external injury. Diseases are medical conditions that are often identifiable by specific signs and symptoms. They may be caused by external factors such as infectious pathogens or by internal dysfunctions such as immune deficiency or senescence.
DNA
See deoxyribonucleic acid.
DNA replication
The chemical duplication or copying of a DNA molecule; the process of producing two identical copies from one original DNA molecule, in which the double helix is unwound and each strand acts as a template for the next strand. Complementary nucleotide bases are matched to synthesize the new partner strands.
DNA sequencing
The process of determining the precise order of nucleotides within a DNA molecule.
drug
Any substance that causes a change in an organism's physiology or psychology when consumed. Drugs may be naturally occurring or artificially produced, and consumption may occur in a number of different ways. Drugs are typically distinguished from substances that provide nutritional support such as food.
dimorphism
The existence of a morphological distinction between organisms of the same species, such that individuals of that species occur in one of two distinct forms which differ in one or more characteristics, such as colour, size, shape, or any other phenotypic trait. Dimorphism based on sex – e.g. male vs. female – is common in sexually reproducing organisms such as plants and animals.
dynein
A motor protein in cells which converts the chemical energy contained in ATP into the mechanical energy of movement.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
E
ecological efficiency
The efficiency with which energy is transferred from one trophic level to the next. It is determined by a combination of efficiencies relating to organismic resource acquisition and assimilation in an ecosystem.
ecological pyramid
Also called a trophic pyramid, eltonian pyramid, energy pyramid, or sometimes food pyramid.

A graphical representation of the biomass or bio-productivity generated at each trophic level in a given ecosystem.
ecological succession
The more or less predictable and orderly set of changes that occurs in the composition or structure of an ecological community over time.
ecology
The scientific analysis and study of interactions between organisms and their environment. It is an interdisciplinary field that combines concepts from biology, geography, and Earth science.
ecophysiology
A biological discipline that studies the adaptation of an organism's physiology to environmental conditions.
ecosystem
A community of living organisms in conjunction with the non-living components of their physical environment, interacting as a system.
ecotype
Sometimes called an ecospecies.

In evolutionary ecology, a genetically distinct geographic variety, population, or race within a species which is adapted to specific environmental conditions.
ectoderm
The outermost layer of cells or tissue of an embryo in early development, or the parts derived from this, which include the epidermis, nerve tissue, and nephridia.
ectotherm
An organism in which internal physiological sources of heat are of relatively small or quite negligible importance in controlling body temperature compared to ambient sources of heat. Ectotherms generally experience changes in body temperature that closely match changes in the temperature of their environment; colloquially, these organisms are often referred to as "cold-blooded". Contrast endotherm.
effector
A small molecule that selectively binds to a protein and regulates its biological activity. In this manner, effector molecules act as ligands that can increase or decrease enzyme activity, gene expression, or cell signaling.
efferent
Conducted or conducting outwards or away from something (for nerves, the central nervous system; for blood vessels, the organ supplied). Contrast afferent.
egg
The organic vessel containing the zygote in which an animal embryo develops until it can survive on its own, at which point the developing organism emerges from the egg in a process known as hatching.
electrochemical gradient
A gradient of electrochemical potential, usually for an ion that can move across a membrane. The gradient consists of two parts: the electrical potential and the difference in chemical concentration across the membrane.
electron acceptor
Any chemical entity that accepts electrons transferred to it from another chemical entity. It is an oxidizing agent that, by virtue of its accepting electrons, is itself reduced in the process. Contrast electron donor.
electron carrier
Any of various molecules that are capable of accepting one or two electrons from one molecule and donating them to another in the process of electron transport. As the electrons are transferred from one electron carrier to another, their energy level decreases, and energy is released.
electron donor
A chemical entity that donates electrons to another chemical entity. It is a reducing agent that, by virtue of its giving up its electrons, is itself oxidized in the process. Contrast electron acceptor.
electron microscope
A type of microscope that uses a beam of electrons to create an image of a sample or specimen. Electron microscopes are capable of much higher magnifications and have greater resolving power than conventional light microscopes, allowing them to see much smaller objects in finer detail.
electron transport chain
The process of oxidative phosphorylation, by which the NADH and succinate generated by the citric acid cycle are oxidized and electrons are transferred sequentially down a long series of proteins, ultimately to the enzyme ATP synthase, which uses the electrical energy to catalyze the synthesis of ATP by the addition of a phosphate group to ADP. The process takes place in the cell's mitochondria and is the primary means of energy generation in most eukaryotic organisms.
embryo
A developing stage of a multicellular organism.
embryology
The branch of biology that studies the development of gametes (sex cells), fertilization, and development of embryos and fetuses. Additionally, embryology involves the study of congenital disorders that occur before birth.
endangered species
Any species which is very likely to become extinct in the near future, either worldwide or in a particular area. Such species may be threatened by factors such as habitat loss, hunting, disease, and climate change, and most have a declining population or a very limited range.
endemism
The ecological state of an organism or species being unique to a defined geographic location, such as an island, nation, country, habitat type, or other defined zone. Organisms are said to be endemic to a place if they are indigenous to it and found nowhere else.
endergonic reaction
Also called a nonspontaneous reaction or unfavorable reaction.

A type of chemical reaction in which the standard change in free energy is positive, and energy is absorbed.
endocrine gland
A gland of the animalian endocrine system that secretes hormones directly into the blood rather than through a duct. In humans, the major glands of the endocrine system include the pineal gland, pituitary gland, pancreas, ovaries, testes, thyroid gland, parathyroid gland, hypothalamus, and adrenal glands.
endocrine system
The collection of glands that produce hormones which regulate metabolism, growth and development, tissue function, and a wide variety of other biological processes.
endocytosis
A form of active transport in which a cell transports molecules such as proteins into the cell's interior by engulfing them in an energy-consuming process.
endoderm
One of the three primary germ layers in the very early human embryo. The other two layers are the ectoderm (outside layer) and mesoderm (middle layer), with the endoderm being the innermost layer.
endogenous
(of a substance or process) Originating from within a system (such as an organism, tissue, or cell), as with endogenous cannabinoids and circadian rhythms. Contrast exogenous.
endoplasmic reticulum
A type of organelle found in eukaryotic cells that forms an interconnected network of flattened, membrane-enclosed sacs or tube-like structures known as cisternae.
endosperm
The tissue produced inside the seeds of most of the flowering plants following fertilization.
endosymbiotic theory
Also called symbiogenesis.

An evolutionary theory regarding the origin of eukaryotic cells from a hypothetical internal symbiosis between prokaryotic organisms, first articulated in 1905 and 1910 by the Russian botanist Konstantin Mereschkowski, and advanced and substantiated with microbiological evidence by Lynn Margulis in 1967.
endotherm
An organism that is capable of maintaining a consistent, metabolically favorable body temperature, largely by the recycling of heat released by its internal physiological functions, instead of by relying on ambient sources of heat. Endotherms are generally able to maintain a stable body temperature despite changes in the temperature of their environment; colloquially, these organisms are often referred to as "warm-blooded". Contrast ectotherm.
entomology
The scientific study of insects.
environmental biology
The branch of biology concerned with the relations between organisms and their environments.
enzyme
A protein that acts as a biological catalyst by accelerating chemical reactions. Metabolic pathways depend upon enzymes to catalyze their individual steps, and almost all metabolic processes require enzyme catalysis in order to occur at rates fast enough to sustain life.
epidemiology
The study and analysis of the patterns, causes, and effects of health and disease conditions in defined populations. It is the cornerstone of public health, and shapes policy decisions and evidence-based practice by identifying risk factors for disease and targets for preventive healthcare.
epigenetics
A sub-field of genetics that studies cellular and physiological phenotypic trait variations caused by external or environmental factors which affect how cells express genes, as opposed to those caused by changes in the DNA sequence.
epiphyte
An organism that grows on the surface of a plant and derives moisture and nutrients from the air, rain, marine environments, or from debris accumulating around it.
essential nutrient
A nutrient required for normal physiological function which cannot be synthesized by a particular organism, either at all or in sufficient quantities, and which therefore must be obtained from external sources such as food. In humans, a set of nine amino acids, two fatty acids, thirteen vitamins, and fifteen minerals are considered essential nutrients.
estrogen
The primary female sex hormone.
ethology
The scientific study of non-human animal behaviour (i.e. excluding human behaviour) and usually with a focus on behaviour under natural conditions, and viewing behaviour as an evolutionarily adaptive trait.
eukaryote
A type of organism consisting of cells which have a nucleus enclosed within a distinct nuclear membrane, unlike prokaryotes. Eukaryotes include all organisms except the bacteria and archaea (i.e. all plants, animals, fungi, and protists are eukaryotes).
evolution
The change in the heritable characteristics of populations of biological organisms over successive generations, which may occur by mutation, gene flow, natural selection, or random chance.
evolutionary biology
The subfield of biology that studies evolution and the evolutionary processes that produced the diversity of life on Earth from a hypothesized single common ancestor. These processes include the descent of species and the origin of new species.
exocytosis
A form of active transport and bulk transport in which a cell transports molecules out of the cell by expelling them through an energy-dependent process.
exogenous
(of a substance or process) Originating outside of or external to a system (such as an organism, tissue, or cell), as with drugs and many pathogens. Contrast endogenous.
exponential growth
It is exhibited when the rate of change of the value of a mathematical function is proportional to the function's current value, resulting in its value at any time being an exponential function of time.
external fertilization
A type of fertilization in which a sperm unites with an egg external to the body or bodies of the parent organisms. Contrast internal fertilization.
extinction
The termination of the existence of a particular kind of organism or a particular taxon, often a species, as a result of the death of the last individual of the taxon (though the capacity to breed and recover may have been lost before this point, rendering the taxon functionally extinct).
extracellular
Of or occurring in the space outside the plasma membrane of a cell. Contrast intracellular.
extranuclear inheritance
A transmission of genes that takes place outside the nucleus.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
F
facultative anaerobe
An organism which is capable of producing energy through aerobic respiration and then switching to anaerobic respiration depending on the amounts of oxygen and fermentable material in the environment.
family
fermentation
A metabolic process that consumes sugar in the absence of oxygen.
fitness
fitness landscape
fertilization
fetus
Also spelled foetus.

An animal embryo after eight weeks of development.
flagellum
(pl.) flagella

A lash-like appendage that protrudes from the cell body of certain bacterial and eukaryotic cells.
flavin adenine dinucleotide (FAD)
A redox cofactor, more specifically a prosthetic group of a protein, involved in different important enzymatic reactions in metabolism.
food chain
The chain of eating and getting nutrition which starts from a small herbivores animal and ends up at a big carnivorous organism.
foramen
(pl.) foramimina

An open hole that is present in extant or extinct amniotes. Foramina inside the body of animals typically allow muscles, nerves, arteries, veins, or other structures to connect one part of the body with another.
founder effect
A loss of genetic variation that takes places when a new population is established by a very small number of individuals from a larger population.
fungi
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
G
G protein
A family of proteins that act as molecular switches inside cells, and are implicated in transmitting signals from a diversity of stimuli outside a cell to its interior.
gamete
gene
Any segment of DNA that contains the information necessary to produce a functional RNA and/or protein product in a controlled manner. Genes are often considered the fundamental molecular units of heredity. The transmission of genes from a parent cell or organism to its offspring is the basis of the inheritance of phenotypic traits.
gene pool
A set of all genes, or genetic information, in any population, usually of a particular species.
generation
genetic code
A set of rules used by living cells to translate information encoded within genetic material (DNA or mRNA sequences) into proteins.
genetic drift
An alteration in the frequency of an existing gene variant in a population due to random sampling of organisms.
genetic variation
Variations of genomes between members of species, or between groups of species thriving in different parts of the world as a result of genetic mutation. Genetic diversity in a population or species is a result of new gene combinations (e.g. crossing over of chromosomes), genetic mutations, genetic drift, etc.
genetics
The study of heredity.
genome
The entire set of genetic material contained within the chromosomes of an organism, organelle, or virus.
genotype
Part of the genetic makeup of a cell, and therefore of an organism or individual, which determines one of its characteristics (phenotype).
genus
gizzard
An organ found in the digestive tract of some animals, including archosaurs (pterosaurs, crocodiles, alligators, and dinosaurs, including birds), earthworms, some gastropods, some fish, and some crustaceans.
guanine
One of the four main nucleobases found in the nucleic acids DNA and RNA, the others being adenine, cytosine, and thymine (uracil in RNA).
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
H
habitat
A place for animals, people, and plants and non-living things.
habituation
A form of learning in which an organism decreases or desists its responses to a stimulus after repeated or prolonged presentations.
heredity
The passing on of phenotypic traits from parents to their offspring, either through sexual or asexual reproduction. Offspring cells and organisms are said to inherit the genetic information of their parents.
hermaphrodite
A sexually reproducing organism with both male and female reproductive organs.
herpetology
The branch of zoology that studies reptiles and amphibians.
heterosis
The improved or increased function of any biological quality in a hybrid offspring.
heterotroph
histology
The study of the microscopic anatomy of cells and tissues of plants and animals.
Hodgkin–Huxley model
A mathematical model that describes how action potentials in neurons are initiated and propagated.
hormone
Any member of a class of signaling molecules produced by glands in multicellular organisms that are transported by the circulatory system to target distant organs to regulate physiology and behaviour.
host
Any living organism that harbors another living organism (known as a "guest" or symbiont), whether the guest is parasitic, mutualistic, or commensalist in its interactions with the host. The guest typically receives shelter and nourishment from the host.
hybrid
hydrocarbon
An organic compound consisting entirely of hydrogen and carbon atoms. Hydrocarbons from which one hydrogen atom has been removed are functional groups called hydrocarbyls.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
I
ichthyology
The branch of biology devoted to the study of fish, including bony fishes (Osteichthyes), cartilaginous fish (Chondrichthyes), and jawless fish (Agnatha).
immune response
The immune response is how your body recognizes and defends itself against bacteria, viruses, and substances that appear foreign and harmful.
immunity
immunoglobulin
Any of a class of glycoprotein molecules produced by plasma cells (white blood cells) which act as a critical part of the immune response by specifically recognizing and binding to particular antigens, such as bacteria or viruses, and aiding in their destruction. They are a major component of the group of immune defense molecules collectively called antibodies.
infection
The invasion of an organism's cells or tissues by a disease-causing pathogen, its growth and/or multiplication, and the reaction of the host organism to the infectious agent and the toxins it produces. The variety of biological pathogens capable of causing infections includes certain bacteria, viruses, fungi, protists, parasitic worms, and arthropods.
insulin
An anabolic peptide hormone produced in the pancreas which helps to regulate the metabolism of carbohydrates, fats, and protein by promoting the absorption of glucose from the blood into liver, fat, and skeletal muscle cells. Abnormal insulin activity is the cause of diabetes mellitus.
integrative biology
The various forms of cross-disciplinary and multitaxon research.
interferon
A group of signaling proteins made and released by host cells in response to the presence of several pathogens, such as viruses, bacteria, parasites, or tumor cells. In a typical scenario, a virus-infected cell will release interferons causing nearby cells to heighten their antiviral defenses.
internal fertilization
A type of fertilization which takes place inside the egg-producing individual.
International System of Units
(French: Système international d'unités; abbreviated SI) The modern standardized form of the metric system of units and measurements, and the system of measurement formally adopted for use in the physical and natural sciences.
interphase
intracellular
Of or occurring inside or within the enclosed interior of a cell. Contrast extracellular.
introduced species
Also called an exotic species, foreign species, alien species, non-native species, or non-indigenous species.

Any species living outside its native geographic range, and which has arrived there either by accidental or deliberate human activity. Such human-caused introduction of species to foreign environments is distinguished from biological colonization, by which species spread to new areas through "natural" means (i.e. without the involvement of humans).
invertebrate
A group of animals that have no backbone, unlike animals such as reptiles, amphibians, fish, birds, and mammals, which all have a backbone. Among the many extant invertebrate phyla are the Cnidaria, Mollusca, Annelida, Nematoda, and Arthropoda.
ion
An atom or molecule with a net electric charge due to the loss or gain of one or more electrons.
ionic bond
A type of chemical bond involving the complete transfer of valence electron(s) between two atoms. Such bonds typically occur between elements characterized as metals and nonmetals, and generate two oppositely charged ions: the metal loses electrons to become a positively charged cation, and the nonmetal accepts those electrons to become a negatively charged anion.
isomer
A molecule with the same chemical formula as another molecule, but with a different chemical structure. That is, isomers contain the same number of atoms of each element, but have different arrangements of their atoms.
isotonic solution
Refers to two solutions having the same osmotic pressure across a semipermeable membrane. This state allows for the free movement of water across the membrane without changing the concentration of solutes on either side.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
J
jejunum
like gher vertebrates like mammals, birds, and reptiles. It is present between the duodenum and the ileum.
K
kinase
An enzyme that catalyzes the transfer of phosphate groups from high-energy, phosphate-donating molecules to specific substrates.
kingdom
Krebs cycle
See citric acid cycle.
L
larva
(pl.) larvae
A distinct juvenile form many animals undergo before metamorphosis into adults. Animals with indirect development, such as insects, amphibians, or cnidarians, typically have a larval phase of their life cycle.
Law of Independent Assortment
The principle, originally formulated by Gregor Mendel, stating that when two or more characteristics are inherited, individual hereditary factors assort independently during gamete production, giving different traits an equal opportunity of occurring together.
leukocyte
Also called a white blood cell.

A colourless cell of the immune system which circulates in the blood and body fluids and is involved in counteracting foreign substances and disease. There are several types of leukocytes, all amoeboid cells with a nucleus, including lymphocytes, granulocytes, and monocytes.
lichen
life
The characteristic or collection of characteristics that distinguishes physical entities that undergo biological processes (e.g. living organisms) from that those do not (e.g. non-living, inanimate matter), either because such processes have ceased or because they were not present in the first place. What constitutes "life" is notoriously difficult to define, and there is currently no consensus definition, though some popular criteria are that living things are composed of cells, have a life cycle, undergo metabolism, maintain homeostasis, adapt to environments, respond to stimuli, reproduce, and evolve. Biology is the scientific study of life and of living organisms.
life cycle
ligament
The fibrous connective tissue that connects bones to other bones and is also known as articular ligament, articular larua, fibrous ligament, or true ligament.
light-independent reactions
See Calvin cycle.
linked genes
Any set of one or more genes which are sufficiently close together on the same chromosome that they are very unlikely to assort independently and therefore are usually inherited together.
lipid
A substance that is insoluble in water and soluble in alcohol, ether, and chloroform. Lipids are an important component of living cells. Together with carbohydrates and proteins, lipids are the main constituents of plant and animal cells. Cholesterol and triglycerides are lipids.
lipoprotein
A biochemical assembly that contains both proteins and lipids, bound to the proteins, which allow fats to move through the water inside and outside cells. The proteins serve to emulsify the lipid molecules.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
M
M phase
Mitosis and cytokinesis together define the mitotic (M) phase of an animal cell cycle – the division of the mother cell into two daughter cells, genetically identical to each other and to their parent cell.
macroevolution
Evolution on a scale of separated gene pools. Macroevolutionary studies focus on change that occurs at or above the level of species, in contrast with microevolution, which refers to smaller evolutionary changes (typically described as changes in allele frequencies) within a species or population.
macromolecule
A very large molecule, such as a protein, commonly created by polymerization of smaller subunits (monomers). They are typically composed of thousands or more atoms.
macronutrient
Nutrients needed in large amounts which provide calories or energy. Nutrients are substances needed for growth, metabolism, and for other body functions. There are three basic types of macronutrients: fats, proteins, and carbohydrates.
macrophage
A kind of swallowing cell, which means it functions by literally swallowing up other particles or smaller cells. Macrophages engulf and digest debris (such as dead cells) and foreign particles through the process of phagocytosis, so macrophages act like scavengers.
mammalogy
The branch of biology that studies mammals, a class of vertebrates with characteristics such as homeothermic metabolism, fur, four-chambered hearts, and complex nervous systems.
marine biology
The study of organisms in the ocean or other marine bodies of water. Given that in biology many phyla, families and genera have some species that live in the sea and others that live on land, marine biology classifies species based on the environment rather than on taxonomy.
mast cell
A cell filled with basophil granules, found in numbers in connective tissue and releasing histamine and other substances during inflammatory and allergic reactions.
mating
medulla
The continuation of the spinal cord within the skull, forming the lowest part of the brainstem and containing control centres for the heart and lungs.
meiosis
A specialized type of cell division in which a dividing parent cell proceeds through two consecutive divisions, ultimately producing four genetically unique daughter cells in each of which the chromosome number is half of that in the original parent cell. This process is exclusive to cells of the sex organs in sexually reproducing eukaryotes, where it serves the purpose of generating gametes such as eggs, sperm, or spores.
membrane potential
When a nerve or muscle cell is at "rest", its membrane potential is called the resting membrane potential. In a typical neuron, this is about –70 millivolts (mV). The minus sign indicates that the inside of the cell is negative with respect to the surrounding extracellular fluid.
messenger RNA
A large family of RNA molecules that convey genetic information from DNA to the ribosome.
metabolism
metamorphosis
metaphase
The third phase of mitosis, in which duplicated genetic material carried in the nucleus of a parent cell is separated into two identical daughter cells. During metaphase, the cell's chromosomes align themselves in the middle of the cell through a type of cellular "tug of war".
microbiology
The study of microscopic organisms, such as bacteria, viruses, archaea, fungi and protozoa. This discipline includes fundamental research on the biochemistry, physiology, cell biology, ecology, evolution and clinical aspects of microorganisms, including the host response to these agents.
microevolution
The alteration in allele frequencies that occurs over time within a population.
mitochondria
(sing.) mitochondrion

mitosis
In eukaryotic cells, the part of the cell cycle during which the division of the nucleus takes place and duplicated chromosomes are separated into two distinct nuclei. Mitosis is generally preceded by the "S" stage of interphase, when the cell's DNA is replicated, and followed by cytokinesis, when the cytoplasm and cell membrane are divided into two new daughter cells. It is similar to but distinct from binary fission and meiosis.
molecule
The smallest particle in a chemical element or compound that has the chemical properties of that element or compound. Molecules are made up of atoms that are held together by chemical bonds. These bonds form as a result of the sharing or exchange of electrons among atoms.
molecular biology
The branch of biology concerning biological activity at the molecular level. The field of molecular biology overlaps with biology and chemistry and in particular with genetics and biochemistry.
molecular switch
A molecule that can be reversibly changed between two or more stable states.
monomer
A molecule that "can undergo polymerization thereby contributing constitutional units to the essential structure of a macromolecule".
morphology
motile
motor neuron
A neuron whose cell body is situated in the motor cortex, brain stem, or the spinal cord, and whose axon (fiber) projects to the spinal cord or outside of the spinal cord to directly or indirectly control effector organs, mainly muscles and glands.
mucous membrane
A membrane that lines various cavities in the body and covers the surface of internal organs.
multicellular
Having or consisting of more than one cell, as opposed to being unicellular.
mycology
The branch of biology concerned with the study of fungi, including their genetic and biochemical properties, their taxonomy and their use to humans as a source for tinder, medicine, food, and entheogens, as well as their dangers, such as poisoning or infection.
myofibril
A basic rod-like unit of a muscle cell.
myosin
A superfamily of motor proteins best known for their roles in muscle contraction and in a wide range of other motility processes in eukaryotes.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
N
natural selection
A process in nature in which organisms possessing certain genotypic characteristics that make them better adjusted to an environment tend to survive, reproduce, increase in number or frequency, and therefore, are able to transmit and perpetuate their essential genotypic qualities to succeeding generations.
neurobiology
Also called neuroscience.

The scientific study of the nervous system.
neuron
An electrically excitable cell that receives, processes, and transmits information through electrical and chemical signals.
neurotransmitter
An endogenous compound that enable neurotransmission.
niche
The role and position an organism or taxon fills within its environment; how it meets its needs for food and shelter, how it survives, and how it reproduces. A species' niche includes all of its interactions with the biotic and abiotic factors of its environment.
nitrogen fixation
The chemical process by which molecular nitrogen (N2) in the air is converted into ammonia (NH3) or related nitrogenous compounds, typically by specialized microorganisms in soil and aquatic ecosystems but also by certain non-biological processes. Despite comprising nearly 80% of the gas in the Earth's atmosphere, diatomic nitrogen is metabolically useless to all but a few microorganisms, known as diazotrophs. Nitrogen fixation is essential to all life on Earth because fixed inorganic nitrogenous compounds are required for the biosynthesis of all nitrogen-containing organic compounds, including amino acids and nucleic acids.
nucleic acid
The biopolymers, or small biomolecules, essential to all known forms of life .
nucleic acid sequence
A succession of letters that indicate the order of nucleotides forming alleles within a DNA or RNA molecule.
nucleobase
The nitrogen-containing biological compounds that form nucleosides, which in turn are components of nucleotides, with all of these monomers constituting the basic building blocks of nucleic acids.
nucleoid
An irregularly shaped region within the cell of a prokaryote that contains all or most of the genetic material, called the genophore.
nucleolus
The largest structure within the nucleus of eukaryotic cells.
nucleotide
An organic compound which serves as the fundamental monomer used in the construction of nucleic acid polymers, such as DNA and RNA, both of which are essential biomolecules within all living organisms.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
O
offspring
order
organ
A collection of tissues joined in a structural unit to serve a common function.
organism
A contiguous living system.
ornithology
The branch of zoology that concerns the study of birds.
osmosis
The spontaneous net movement of solvent molecules through a semipermeable membrane into a region of higher solute concentration, in the direction that tends to equalize the solute concentrations on the two sides.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
P
paleontology
The study of the history of life on Earth as reflected in the fossil record. Fossils are the remains or traces of organisms that lived in the geological past and have been preserved in the Earth's crust.
parallel evolution
The development of a similar trait in related, but distinct, species descending from the same ancestor, but from different clades.
parasite
parasitology
The study of parasites, their hosts, and the relationship between them. As a biological discipline, the scope of parasitology is not determined by the organism or environment in question, but by their way of life.
pathobiology
The study or practice of pathology with greater emphasis on the biological than on the medical aspects.
pathogen
In the broadest sense, anything that can produce disease, though the term is most commonly used to refer specifically to an infectious microscopic organism such as a virus, bacterium, protozoan, or another microbial agent which causes disease for a host organism by invading the host's tissues.
pathology
A medical specialty that is concerned with the diagnosis of disease based on the laboratory analysis of bodily fluids such as blood and urine, as well as tissues, using the tools of chemistry, clinical microbiology, hematology, and molecular pathology.
pH
A numeric scale used to specify the acidity or basicity (alkalinity) of an aqueous solution. It is roughly the negative of the logarithm to base 10 of the concentration, measured in units of moles per liter, of hydrogen ions.
pharmacology
The science of drug action on biological systems. In its entirety, it embraces knowledge of the sources, chemical properties, biological effects, and therapeutic uses of drugs.
phenotype
The composite of an organism's observable features or traits, such as its morphology, development, biochemical or physiological properties, behavior, and products of behavior.
pheromone
A secreted or excreted chemical factor that triggers a social response in members of the same species. Pheromones are analogous to hormones acting outside the body of the secreting individual to impact the behavior of receiving individuals.
phloem
The conducting tissue in plants responsible for the conduction of food particles.
photosynthesis
The process by which nearly all plants and some algae and bacteria convert the energy of sunlight into chemical energy, which is used to synthesize carbohydrates such as sugars from carbon dioxide and water; these carbohydrates are stored as food, and the energy within them is later released to fuel metabolic activities. Organisms that perform photosynthesis are therefore autotrophs. Photosynthesis supplies the majority of the energy necessary for life on Earth.
phylogeny
phylum
A taxonomic rank or level of classification below kingdom and above class; in botany, the term division is commonly used in place of phylum.
physiology
The branch of biology dealing with the functions and activities of living organisms and their parts, including all physical and chemical processes.
phytochemistry
The study of phytochemicals, which are chemicals derived from plants.
phytopathology
The science of diagnosing and managing plant diseases.
piliferous
Bearing hair
biology
placebo
A substance or treatment of no intended therapeutic value.
plant
plasmolysis
biology
The process in which cells lose water in a hypertonic solution.
pollination
The transfer of pollen from a male part of a plant to a female part of a plant, enabling later fertilisation and the production of seeds. Pollen is most commonly transported by animals or by wind.
polymer
A large macromolecule composed of many repeated subunits.
polymerase chain reaction (PCR)
A technique used in molecular biology to amplify a single copy or a few copies of a segment of DNA across several orders of magnitude, generating thousands to millions of copies of a particular DNA sequence.
polyploidy
Having or containing more than two complete sets of chromosomes.
population
biology biology 
All the organisms of the same group or species that live in a particular geographical area and are capable of interbreeding.
population biology
The study of populations of organisms, especially the regulation of population size, life history traits such as clutch size, and extinction.
population ecology
Also called autoecology.

A subfield of ecology that deals with the dynamics of species populations and how these populations interact with the environment. It is the study of how the population sizes of species change over time and space.
predation
A biological interaction in which a predator kills and eats its prey.
predator
prey
primer
A short strand of RNA or DNA that serves as a starting point for DNA synthesis.
progeny
Any genetic descendant or offspring.
progesterone
An endogenous steroid and progestogen sex hormone which plays a critical role in the menstrual cycle, pregnancy, and embryogenesis in humans and other animal species.
prokaryote
A type of organism which does not have a true nucleus.
protein
A polypeptide chain of amino acids. It is a body-building nutrient.
protist
psychobiology
Also called behavioral neuroscience, biological psychology, and biopsychology.

The application of the principles of biology to the study of physiological, genetic, and developmental mechanisms of behavior in humans and other animals.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
R
regeneration
The process of renewal, restoration, and growth that makes genomes, cells, organisms, and ecosystems resilient to natural fluctuations or events that cause disturbance or damage. For example, many organisms are capable of regenerating tissues and even entire body parts if they are lost or destroyed.
reproduction
Also called procreation or breeding.

The biological process by which one or more new individual organisms (known as offspring) is produced from an existing parent organism. Reproduction is a defining characteristic of all life, and every individual organism exists as the result of a reproductive event. There are two general methods by which reproduction takes place: sexual or asexual.
reproductive biology
The branch of biology that studies the various types and mechanisms of reproduction used by living organisms, typically with special emphasis on cell division, fertility, endocrinology, and/or the tissues, organs, and systems involved in reproduction.
ribonucleic acid (RNA)
A nucleic acid polymer composed of a series of ribonucleotides which incorporate a set of four nucleobases: adenine (A), guanine (G), cytosine (C), and uracil (U). Closely related to DNA, RNA molecules serve in a wide variety of essential biological roles, including coding, decoding, regulating, and expressing genes, as well as functioning as signaling molecules.
ribosome
A complex molecular machine, found within all living cells, that serves as the site of biological protein synthesis.
RNA
See ribonucleic acid.
RNA polymerase
A member of a family of enzymes that are essential to life: they are found in all organisms and many viruses.
S
sclerenchyma
A type of tissue in which cells have thick lignified secondary walls and often die when mature.
seed
The embryo, enclosed in a protective outer covering, of certain types of plants.
selective breeding
See artificial selection.
sessile
1.  Generally, lacking motility or means of self-locomotion; immobile or incapable of movement. Sessile organisms may move via external forces such as wind or water currents but are more often permanently fixed to a solid object such as a rock, soil, or another organism.
2.  In botany, the property of a plant or plant part that is attached directly by its base to an object or another plant part, i.e. without an intervening stem, stalk, or petiole.
sex
sexual reproduction
A type of reproduction in which cells from two parents unite to form the first cell of a new organism.
sociality
The degree to which individuals in an animal population tend to associate in social groups and form cooperative societies.
sociobiology
A branch of biology that is based on the hypothesis that social behavior has resulted from evolution and which attempts to explain and examine social behavior within that context.
soil biology
The study of microbial and faunal activity and ecology in soil.
species
The basic unit of biological classification and the narrowest of the canonical taxonomic ranks, as well as a unit of biodiversity. Species are traditionally distinguished on the basis of reproductive compatibility, though achieving a satisfactory definition that is universally applicable to all life has proven difficult, since many organisms classified as distinct "species" are capable of interbreeding with different (albeit closely related) species, generating hybrids.
speciation
The evolutionary process by which populations of organisms evolve to become distinct species, typically via reproductive isolation.
sperm
spore
stem cell
A type of undifferentiated or partially undifferentiated cell that is capable of differentiating into other types of specialized cells and also capable of dividing to produce more of the same type of stem cell. Stem cells are the earliest type of cell in a cell lineage.
steroid
A biologically active organic compound with four rings arranged in a specific molecular configuration.
strain
A genetic variant, subtype, or culture identified as a distinct taxonomic subdivision within a species. The term is most commonly used to identify particular types of bacteria and viruses.
structural biology
The branch of molecular biology, biochemistry, and biophysics concerned with the molecular structure of biological macromolecules, especially proteins and nucleic acids, how they acquire the structures they have, and how alterations in their structures affect their function.
symbiogenesis
See endosymbiotic theory.
symbiont
Any organism involved in any type of symbiosis with another organism, either of the same or a different species.
symbiosis
Any close and long-term interaction between two different biological organisms, regardless of the nature or degree of the effect on either organism. Examples include mutualism, commensalism, and parasitism.
synthetic biology
An interdisciplinary branch of biology and engineering combining various disciplines from within these domains, including biotechnology, evolutionary biology, molecular biology, systems biology, biophysics, computer engineering, and genetic engineering.
systematics
The scientific study of biodiversity. It is concerned with the discovering and naming of new species of organisms (nomenclature) and arranging these taxa into classification schemes (taxonomy). A large part of modern systematics is concerned with understanding the evolutionary relationships between various taxa (phylogenetics) using methods of comparative biology (e.g. physiology, behavior, biochemistry, morphology, genetics) and statistical analysis.
systems biology
A branch of biology concerned with the computational and mathematical analysis of complex biological systems. It is an interdisciplinary field which combines elements of systems theory and applied mathematics with theoretical biology, with a primary aim to discover and model the emergent properties of interacting biological entities.
Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
T
T cell
A type of lymphocyte that plays a central role in cell-mediated immunity.
taxon
(pl.) taxa

A group of one or more populations of an organism or organisms used by taxonomists to classify organisms into discrete, convenient, and identifiable units.
taxonomy
telophase
testosterone
The primary male sex hormone and an anabolic steroid.
thymine
One of the four nucleobases used in the nucleic acid DNA (but not in RNA). It is represented in DNA sequences by the letter T.
tissue
trait
transcription
The first step of gene expression, in which a particular segment of DNA is copied into RNA by the enzyme RNA polymerase. Both RNA and DNA are nucleic acids, which use complementary base pairs of nucleotides as a common language.
translation
The process by which ribosomes in the cytoplasm or endoplasmic reticulum synthesize proteins following the transcription of DNA to RNA in the cell's nucleus.
trophic level
The position an organism occupies in a food chain.
tumor
Also called a neoplasm.

Contents:  
0–9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZSee alsoReferencesExternal links
U
uncoating
The decomposition of a viral capsid. An informal and simplified description of the way a virus infectious material enters the cell, usually appearing in light science material for the general public.
unicellular
Having or consisting of only one cell, as opposed to being multicellular.
uracil
One of the four nucleobases in the nucleic acid of RNA that are represented by the letters A, G, C and U.
urea
An organic compound with chemical formula CO(NH2)2.
urine
A liquid byproduct of metabolism in humans and in many animals.
uterus
A major female hormone-responsive secondary sex organ of the reproductive system in humans and most other mammals.
V
vacuole
A membrane-bound organelle which is present in all plant and fungal cells and some protist, animal, and bacterial cells.
vasodilation
The widening of blood vessels.
vector
vegetative reproduction
Any type of asexual reproduction performed by an organism which is nonetheless capable of sexual reproduction. The term is used primarily for plants.
vertebrate
vesicle
A small structure within or sometimes external to a cell, consisting of fluid enclosed by a lipid bilayer.
vestigiality
The retention during the process of evolution of genetically determined structures or attributes that have lost some or all of their ancestral function in a given species.
virology
The branch of biology that studies viruses.
virus
A submicroscopic, infectious, parasitic particle of genetic material contained in a protein coat and which replicates only inside the living cell of a host organism.
Contents:  
 
W
white blood cell
See leukocyte.
whole genome sequencing
The process of determining the complete DNA sequence of a particular organism's entire genome at a single time.
wood
The inner layer of the stems of woody plants such as trees and shrubs, composed of xylem.
X
xanthophyll
A yellow-colored photosynthetic pigment.
xylem
A type of plant tissue responsible for the transport of water from roots to aerial parts of the plant.
Y
yolk
The nutrient-bearing portion of the egg whose primary function is to supply food for the development of the embryo.
Z
zoology
The branch of biology that studies the animal kingdom, including the structure, embryology, evolution, classification, habits, and geographical distribution of all animals, both living and extinct, and how they interact with their ecosystems.
zooplankton
A type of heterotrophic (sometimes detritivorous) plankton, as opposed to phytoplankton, which instead obtain energy from photosynthesis. Individual zooplankton are usually microscopic, but some (such as jellyfish) are larger and visible to the naked eye.
zygospore
A diploid reproductive stage in the life cycle of many fungi and protists.
zygote
A eukaryotic cell formed by a fertilization event between two gametes.
acetyl CoA: the combination of an acetyl group derived from pyruvic acid and coenzyme A 
which is made from pantothenic acid (a B-group vitamin)
acid: a substance that donates hydrogen ions and therefore lowers pH
activation energy: the amount of initial energy necessary for reactions to occur
active site: a specific region on the enzyme where the substrate binds
active transport: the method of transporting materials into or out of a cell that requires energy
adaptation: a heritable trait or behavior in an organism that aids in its survival in its present 
environment
adenosine triphosphate (ATP): is the primary energy currency of all living cells
adhesion: the attraction between water molecules and molecules of a different substance
aerobic cellular respiration: the use of oxygen as an electron acceptor to complete metabolism
alcohol fermentation: the steps that follow the partial oxidation of glucose via glycolysis to 
regenerate NAD+ and produces the products ethanol and carbon dioxide
allele: one of two or more variants of a gene that determines a particular trait for a characteristic
allopatric speciation: a speciation that occurs via a geographic separation 
allosomes: chromosome pair twenty-three and determines a person’s sex
allosteric activation: the mechanism for activating enzyme action in which a regulatory 
molecule binds to a second site (not the active site) and initiates a conformation change in the 
active site, allowing binding with the substrate
allosteric inhibition: the mechanism for inhibiting enzyme action in which a regulatory 
molecule binds to a second site (not the active site) and initiates a conformation change in the 
active site, preventing binding with the substrate
alternative RNA splicing: a post-transcriptional gene regulation mechanism in eukaryotes in 
which multiple protein products are produced by a single gene through alternative splicing 
combinations of the RNA transcript
amino acid: a monomer of a protein
anabolic: describes the pathway that requires a net energy input to synthesize complex 
molecules from simpler ones
anaerobic cellular respiration: the use of an electron acceptor other than oxygen to complete 
metabolism
anaerobic: process in which organisms do not require oxygen
II Return to Table of Contents
analogous structure: a structure that is similar because of evolution in response to similar 
selection pressures resulting in convergent evolution, not similar because of descent from a 
common ancestor
anaphase: the stage of mitosis during which sister chromatids are separated from each other
aneuploid: an individual with an error in chromosome number; includes deletions and
duplications of chromosome segments
anion: a negative ion formed by gaining electrons
anticodon: three consecutive nucleotides on tRNA that complement the codon on a mRNA
aquaporin: channel protein that allows water through the membrane at a very high rate
asexual reproduction: produces genetically identical clones to the parent organism
atom: a basic unit of matter that cannot be broken down by normal chemical reactions
atomic number: the number of protons in an atom
ATP synthase: a membrane-embedded protein complex that regenerates ATP from ADP with 
energy from protons diffusing through it
ATP: adenosine triphosphate; the cell's energy currency
autosomal dominant inheritance: pattern of dominant inheritance that corresponds to a gene on 
one of the 22 autosomal chromosomes
autosomal recessive inheritance: pattern of recessive inheritance that corresponds to a gene on 
one of the 22 autosomal chromosomes
autosome: chromosome pairs one through twenty-two and does not determine a person’s sex
autotroph: an organism that can make its own food from materials in its environment
B
base: a substance that absorbs hydrogen ions and therefore raises pH
binary fission: the process of prokaryotic cell division
biology: the study of life
biosphere: a collection of all ecosystems on Earth
blending hypothesis of inheritance: states that when two individuals made an offspring, their 
original parental traits were lost because their traits blended together when the offspring was 
formed
bottleneck effect: the magnification of genetic drift as a result of natural events or catastrophes
buffer: a solution that resists a change in pH by absorbing or releasing hydrogen or hydroxide 
ions
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ III
C
Calvin cycle: the reactions of photosynthesis that use the energy stored by the light-dependent 
reactions to form glucose and other carbohydrate molecules
carbohydrate: a biological macromolecule in which the ratio of carbon to hydrogen to oxygen is 
1:2:1; carbohydrates serve as energy sources and structural support in cells
carriers: a heterozygous individual who does not display symptoms of a recessive genetic 
disorder but can transmit the disorder to his or her offspring
catabolic: describes the pathway in which complex molecules are broken down into simpler 
ones, yielding energy as an additional product of the reaction
catalyst: substances that speed up the rate of chemical reactions
cation: a positive ion formed by losing electrons
cell cycle checkpoints: mechanisms that monitor the preparedness of a eukaryotic cell to 
advance through the various cell cycle stages
cell cycle: the ordered sequence of events that a cell passes through between one cell division 
and the next
cell plate: a structure formed during plant-cell cytokinesis by Golgi vesicles fusing at the
cell theory: the biological concept that states that all organisms are composed of one or more 
cells, the cell is the basic unit of life, and new cells arise from existing cells
cell wall: a rigid cell covering made of cellulose in plants, peptidoglycan in bacteria, non peptidoglycan compounds in Archaea, and chitin in fungi that protects the cell, provides 
structural support and gives shape to the cell
cell: the smallest fundamental unit of structure and function in living things
cellulose: a polysaccharide that makes up the cell walls of plants and provides structural support 
to the cell
Central dogma: The flow of genetic information in cells from DNA to mRNA to protein
central vacuole: a large plant cell organelle that acts as a storage compartment, water reservoir, 
and site of macromolecule degradation
centrosomes: specialized microtubules that pull chromosomes to their poles during cell division 
and also give rise to the mitotic spindle
characteristic: different heritable, physical features
chemical bond: an interaction between two or more of the same or different elements that result 
in the formation of molecules
chemical energy: type of potential energy that exists within chemical bonds
chemical reactions: occur when two or more atoms bond together to form molecules or when 
bonded atoms break apart
chemiosmosis: the movement of hydrogen ions down their electrochemical gradient across a 
membrane through ATP synthase to generate ATP
IV Return to Table of Contents
chemoautotrophs: an organism capable of producing its own food by extracting energy from 
inorganic chemical compounds
chiasmata: (singular = chiasma) the structure that forms at the crossover points after genetic 
material is exchanged
chitin: a type of carbohydrate that forms the outer skeleton of arthropods, such as insects and 
crustaceans, and the cell walls of fungi
chlorophyll a: the form of chlorophyll that absorbs violet-blue and red light
chlorophyll b: the form of chlorophyll that absorbs blue and red-orange light
chlorophyll: the green pigment that captures the light energy that drives the reactions of 
photosynthesis
chloroplast: a plant cell organelle that carries out photosynthesis
cholesterol: a lipid that plays an important role in membrane fluidity
chromatin: DNA wound around proteins forming long fiber-like strands
Chromosomal Theory of Inheritance: a theory proposing that chromosomes are the genes' 
vehicles and that their behavior during meiosis is the physical basis of the inheritance patterns 
that Mendel observed
chromosome: structures made of chromatin that are visible when the cell is dividing
cilium: (plural: cilia) a short, hair-like structure that extends from the plasma membrane in 
large numbers and is used to move an entire cell or move substances along the outer surface of 
the cell
citric acid cycle: a series of enzyme-catalyzed chemical reactions of central importance in all 
living cells that harvest the energy in carbon-carbon bonds of sugar molecules to generate ATP; 
the citric acid cycle is an aerobic metabolic pathway because it requires oxygen in later reactions 
to proceed
cleavage furrow: a constriction formed by the actin ring during animal-cell cytokinesis that 
leads to cytoplasmic division
codominance: in a heterozygote, complete and simultaneous expression of both alleles for the 
same characteristic
codon: three consecutive nucleotides in mRNA that specify the addition of a specific amino acid 
or the release of a polypeptide chain during translation
coenzyme: small organic molecules, such as a vitamin or its derivative, which is required to 
enhance an enzyme's activity
cofactor: inorganic ion, such as iron and magnesium ions, required for optimal enzyme activity 
regulation
cohesion: the intermolecular forces between water molecules caused by the polar nature of 
water; creates surface tension
community: a set of populations inhabiting a particular area
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ V
competitive inhibition: a general mechanism of enzyme activity regulation in which a molecule 
other than the enzyme’s substrate can bind the active site and prevent the substrate itself from 
binding, thus inhibiting the overall rate of reaction for the enzyme
complete dominance: in a heterozygote the dominant allele masks the effect of the recessive 
allele
compound: are made up of different types of atoms held together by chemical bonds
concentration gradient: an area of high concentration across from an area of low concentration
continuous variation: a variation in a characteristic in which individuals show a range of traits 
with small differences between them
control: a part of an experiment that does not change during the experiment
convergent evolution: an evolution that results in similar forms on different species
covalent bond: a type of strong bond between two or more of the same or different elements; 
forms when electrons are shared between elements
crossing over: (also, recombination) the exchange of genetic material between homologous 
chromosomes resulting in chromosomes that incorporate genes from both parents of the 
organism forming reproductive cells
cytokinesis: the division of the cytoplasm following mitosis to form two daughter cells
cytoplasm: the entire region between the plasma membrane and the nuclear envelope, consisting 
of organelles suspended in the gel-like cytosol, the cytoskeleton, and various chemicals
cytoskeleton: the network of protein fibers that collectively maintain the shape of the cell, 
secures some organelles in specific positions, allows cytoplasm and vesicles to move within the 
cell, and enables unicellular organisms to move
cytosol: the gel-like material of the cytoplasm in which cell structures are suspended
deductive reasoning: a form of logical thinking that uses a general statement to forecast specific 
dehydration synthesis: a reaction where monomers combine with the help of water (and often 
an enzyme) to form polymers
deletion: a part of a chromosome is lost or removed
denaturation: loss of shape in a protein that may be a result of changes in temperature, pH, or 
chemical exposure
denature: loss of shape in a protein that may be a result of changes in temperature, pH, or 
chemical exposure
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA): a double-stranded polymer of nucleotides that carries the 
hereditary information of the cell
VI Return to Table of Contents
deoxyribose: a five-carbon sugar molecule with a hydrogen atom rather than a hydroxyl group 
in the 2' position; the sugar component of DNA nucleotides
dependent variable: the variable that will change when the independent variable is altered; this 
is what the researcher will measure or observe during the experiment
desmosome: a linkage between adjacent epithelial cells that forms when cadherins in the plasma 
membrane attach to intermediate filaments
diffusion: a passive process of transport where solutes move from an area of high concentration 
to an area of low concentration until equilibrium is met
dihybrid: the result of a cross between two true-breeding parents that express different traits for 
two characteristics
diploid: describes a cell, nucleus, or organism containing two sets of chromosomes (2n)
disaccharide: two sugar monomers that are linked together by a peptide bond
discontinuous variation: a variation in a characteristic in which individuals show two, or a few, 
traits with significant differences between them
divergent evolution: an evolution that results in different forms in two species with a common 
ancestor
DNA ligase: the enzyme that catalyzes the joining of DNA fragments together
DNA polymerase: an enzyme that synthesizes a new strand of DNA complementary to a 
template strand
domain: the highest level of the taxonomic hierarchy; includes the Eukarya, Archaea, and 
Bacteria
dominant: describes a trait that masks the expression of another trait when both versions of the 
gene are present in an individual
double helix: the molecular shape of DNA in which two strands of nucleotides wind around 
each other in a spiral shape
duplication: a part of a chromosome is duplicated and either inserted into a different position on 
the same chromosome or a completely different chromosome
E
ecosystem: all living things in a particular area together with the abiotic, nonliving parts of that 
environment
egg (ovum): the female gamete; a haploid cell
electron transfer: the movement of electrons from one element to another
electron transport chain: a series of four large, multi-protein complexes embedded in the inner 
mitochondrial membrane that accepts electrons from donor compounds and harvests energy from 
a series of chemical reactions to generate a hydrogen ion gradient across the membrane
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ VII
electron: a negatively charged particle that resides outside of the nucleus in the electron orbital; 
lacks functional mass and has a charge of –1
electronegativity: an atom's ability to attract a shared pair of electrons more closely to its own 
nucleus
element: one of 118 unique substances that cannot be broken down into smaller substances and 
retain the characteristic of that substance; each element has a specified number of protons and 
unique properties
embryology: the study an organism’s development from a zygote to its adult form
endergonic: describes a chemical reaction that results in products that store more chemical 
potential energy than the reactants
endocytosis: a type of active transport that moves substances, including fluids and particles, into 
a cell
endomembrane system: the group of organelles and membranes in eukaryotic cells that work 
together to modify, package, and transport lipids and proteins
endoplasmic reticulum (ER): a series of interconnected membranous structures within 
eukaryotic cells that collectively modify proteins and synthesize lipids
endosymbiosis: a relationship in which one organism lives inside the other
endosymbiotic theory: a theory that explains how mitochondria and chloroplasts originated
energy coupling: energy released from exergonic processes is used to support or transferred to 
endergonic processes
energy: the ability to do work or to create change
entropy: the measure of randomness or disorder within a system
enzyme: a molecule that catalyzes a biochemical reaction; speeds up a chemical reaction by 
lowering the amount of activation energy need to initiate a chemical reaction
eukaryote: an organism with cells that have nuclei and membrane-bound organelles
eukaryotic cell: a cell that has a membrane-bound nucleus and several other membrane-bound 
compartments or sacs
euploid: an individual with the appropriate number of chromosomes for their species
evaporation: the release of water molecules from liquid water to form water vapor
evolution: the process of gradual change in a population that can also lead to new species arising 
from older species
exergonic: describes a chemical reaction that results in products with less chemical potential 
energy than the reactants, plus the release of free energy
exocytosis: a process of passing material out of a cell
exon: a sequence present in protein-coding mRNA after completion of pre-mRNA splicing
experimental group: the group where the independent variable is applied
VIII Return to Table of Contents
extracellular matrix: the material, primarily collagen, glycoproteins, and proteoglycans, 
secreted from animal cells that hold cells together as a tissue, allows cells to communicate with 
each other, and provides mechanical protection and anchoring for cells in the tissue
F
F1: the first filial generation in a cross; the offspring of the parental generation
F2: the second filial generation produced when F1 individuals are self-crossed or fertilized with 
each other
facilitated transport: a process by which solutes moves down a concentration gradient (from 
high to low concentration) using integral membrane proteins
falsifiable: it can be shown to be false by experimental results
fat: a lipid molecule composed of three fatty acids and glycerol (triglyceride) that typically exists 
in a solid form at room temperature
feedback inhibition: a mechanism of enzyme activity regulation in which the product of a 
reaction or the final product of a series of sequential reactions inhibits an enzyme for an earlier 
step in the reaction series
fermentation: the steps that follow the partial oxidation of glucose via glycolysis to regenerate 
NAD+; occurs in the absence of oxygen and uses an organic compound as the final electron 
acceptor
fertilization: the union of two haploid cells typically from two individual organisms
first law of thermodynamics: states that the total amount of energy in the universe is constant and 
conserved
flagellum: (plural: flagella) the long, hair-like structure that extends from the plasma membrane 
and is used to move the cell
fluid mosaic model: a model of the structure of the plasma membrane as a mosaic of 
components, including phospholipids, cholesterol, proteins, and glycolipids, resulting in a fluid 
rather than static character
fossils: mineralized or preserved remains of organisms found in the past
founder effect: a magnification of genetic drift in a small population that migrates away from a 
large parent population carrying with it an unrepresentative set of alleles
free energy: usable energy or energy that is available to do work
functional group: groups of atoms that occur within molecules and confer specific chemical 
properties to those molecules
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ IX
G
G0 phase: a cell-cycle phase distinct from the G1 phase of interphase; a cell in G0 is not 
preparing to divide
G1 phase: (also, first gap) a cell-cycle phase; the first phase of interphase centered on cell 
growth during mitosis
G2 phase: (also, second gap) a cell-cycle phase; third phase of interphase where the cell 
undergoes the final preparations for mitosis
gamete: a haploid reproductive cell or sex cell (sperm or egg)
gap junction: a channel between two adjacent animal cells that allows ions, nutrients, and other 
low-molecular-weight substances to pass between the cells, enabling the cells to communicate
gene expression: processes that control whether a gene is expressed
gene flow: the flow of alleles in and out of a population due to the migration of individuals or 
gametes
gene pool: all of the alleles carried by all of the individuals in the population
gene: the basic unit of heredity; a sequence of DNA that codes for a specific peptide or RNA 
molecule
genetic code: the amino acids that correspond to three-nucleotide codons of mRNA
genetic drift: the effect of chance on a population’s gene pool
genome: the entire genetic complement (DNA) of an organism
genotype: the underlying genetic makeup, consisting of both physically visible and non expressed alleles, of an organism
germline cell: specialized cell line that produces gametes, such as eggs or sperm
glycocalyx: a fuzzy-appearing coating around the cell formed from glycoproteins and other 
carbohydrates attached to the cell membrane.
glycogen: a storage carbohydrate in animals
glycolipid: a combination of carbohydrates and lipids
glycolysis: the process of breaking glucose into two three-carbon molecules with the production 
of ATP and NADH
glycoprotein: a combination of carbohydrates and proteins
golgi apparatus: a eukaryotic organelle made up of a series of stacked membranes that sorts, 
tags, and packages lipids and proteins for distribution
granum: a stack of thylakoids located inside a chloroplast
guard cells: specialized plant cells that control the opening and closing of the stomata
X Return to Table of Contents
H
haploid: describes a cell, nucleus, or organism containing one set of chromosomes (n)
Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium: a principle that states a population’s allele and genotype 
frequencies are inherently stable unless evolutionary force(s) is acting on the population
heat energy: the energy transferred from one system to another that is not work
helicase: an enzyme that helps to open up the DNA helix during DNA replication by breaking 
the hydrogen bonds
heterotroph: an organism that cannot make its own food and must consume other organisms to 
obtain its energy
heterotroph: an organism that cannot make its own food and must consume other organisms to 
obtain its energy
heterotroph: an organism that consumes other organisms for food
heterozygous: having two different alleles for a given gene on the homologous chromosomes
homeostasis: the ability of an organism to maintain constant internal conditions
homologous chromosomes: the randomness of how the homologous chromosome pairs align at 
the metaphase plate during metaphase I of meiosis I
homologous structure: a structure that is similar because of descent from a common ancestor
homozygous: having two identical alleles for a given gene on the homologous chromosomes
hormone: a chemical signaling molecule, usually a protein or steroid, secreted by an endocrine 
gland or group of endocrine cells; acts to control or regulate specific physiological processes
hybridization/cross-fertilization: the process of mating two individuals that differ, to achieve a 
certain characteristic in their offspring
hydrocarbon: organic molecules consisting entirely of carbon and hydrogen
hydrogen bond: a weak bond between partially positively charged hydrogen atoms and partially 
negatively charged elements or molecules
hydrolysis reactions: a reaction where a water molecule (and usually an enzyme) is used to 
break a chemical bond within a polymer
hydrophilic: describes a substance that dissolves in water; water-loving
hydrophobic: describes a substance that does not dissolve in water; water-fearing
hypertonic: describes a solution in which extracellular fluid has a higher osmolarity than the 
fluid inside the cell
hypothesis: a testable explanation to a scientific question
hypotonic: describes a solution in which extracellular fluid has a lower osmolarity than the fluid 
inside the cell
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XI
I
incomplete dominance: in a heterozygote, expression of two contrasting alleles such that the 
individual displays an intermediate phenotype
independent assortment: describing something composed of genetic material from two sources, 
such as a chromosome with both maternal and paternal segments of DNA
independent variable: is the variable that is being altered or changed by the researcher; it is the 
variable being tested
inductive reasoning: a form of logical thinking that uses related observations to arrive at a 
general conclusion
inheritance of acquired characteristics: a phrase that describes the mechanism of evolution 
proposed by Lamarck in which traits acquired by individuals through use or disuse could be 
passed on to their offspring thus leading to evolutionary change in the population
integral protein: protein integrated into the membrane structure that interacts extensively with 
the membrane lipids' hydrocarbon chains and often spans the membrane
interkinesis: a period of rest that may occur between meiosis I and meiosis II; there is no 
replication of DNA during interkinesis
intermediate filaments: fibers of the cytoskeleton that are of intermediate diameter and have 
structural functions, such as maintaining the shape of the cell and anchoring organelles
interphase: the period of the cell cycle leading up to mitosis; includes G1, S, and G2 phases; the 
interim between two consecutive cell divisions
intron: non–protein-coding intervening sequences that are spliced from mRNA during 
processing
inversion: the detachment, 180° rotation, and reinsertion of a chromosome arm
ion: an atom or compound that does not contain equal numbers of protons and electrons, and 
therefore has a net charge
ionic bond: a chemical bond that forms between ions of opposite charges
isomers: molecules that share the same chemical formula but differ in the placement (structure) 
of their atoms and or chemical bonds
isotonic: describes a solution in which the extracellular fluid has the same osmolarity as the fluid 
inside the cell
isotope: one or more forms of an element that have different numbers of neutrons
XII Return to Table of Contents
K
karyogram: the photographic image of a karyotype
karyotype: the number and appearance of an individual’s chromosomes, including the size, 
banding patterns, and centromere position
kinetic energy: the type of energy associated with objects in motion
kinetochore: a protein structure in the centromere of each sister chromatid that attracts and binds 
spindle microtubules during prometaphas
lactic acid fermentation: the steps that follow the partial oxidation of glucose via glycolysis to 
regenerate NAD+ and produces the products lactic acid
lagging strand: during replication of the 3' to 5' strand, the strand that is replicated in short 
fragments and away from the replication fork
law of dominance: in a heterozygote, one trait will conceal the presence of another trait for the 
same characteristic
law of independent assortment: genes do not influence each other concerning sorting of alleles 
into gametes; every possible combination of alleles is equally likely to occur
law of segregation: paired unit factors (i.e., genes) segregate equally into gametes such that 
offspring have an equal likelihood of inheriting any combination of factors
leading strand: the strand that is synthesized continuously in the 5' to 3' direction that is 
synthesized in the direction of the replication fork
light-dependent reaction: the first stage of photosynthesis where visible light is absorbed to 
form two energy-carrying molecules (ATP and NADPH)
linkage: a phenomenon in which alleles that are located in close proximity to each other on the
same chromosome are more likely to be inherited together
lipids: a class of macromolecules that are nonpolar and insoluble in water
litmus paper: filter paper that has been treated with a natural water-soluble dye so it can be used 
as a pH indicator
locus: the position of a gene on a chromosome
lysosome: an organelle in an animal cell that functions as the cell’s digestive component; it 
breaks down proteins, polysaccharides, lipids, nucleic acids, and even worn-out organelles
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XIII
M
macroevolution: a broader scale of evolutionary changes seen over paleontological time
macromolecule: a large molecule typically formed by the joining of smaller molecules
mass number: the number of protons plus neutrons in an atom
matter: anything that has mass and occupies space
meiosis I: the first round of meiotic cell division; referred to as reduction division because the 
resulting cells are haploid
meiosis II: the second round of meiotic cell division following meiosis I; sister chromatids are 
separated from each other, and the result is four unique haploid cells
mesophyll: the middle layer of cells in a leaf
messenger RNA: messenger RNA; a form of RNA that carries the nucleotide sequence code for 
a protein sequence that is translated into a polypeptide sequence
metabolic pathway: a series of related chemical reactions is referred to as a
metabolism: all the chemical reactions that take place inside cells, including those that use 
energy and those that release energy
metaphase plate: the equatorial plane midway between two poles of a cell where the 
chromosomes align during metaphase 
metaphase: the stage of mitosis during which chromosomes are lined up at the metaphase plate
microevolution: the changes in a population’s genetic structure (i.e., allele frequency)
microfilaments: the thinnest of the cytoskeletal fibers and function in moving cellular 
components and maintaining cell structure
microscope: the instrument that magnifies an object
microtubules: the thickest fibers that make up the cytoskeleton and can dissolve and reform 
quickly.
migration: the movement of individuals of a population to a new location; in population 
genetics it refers to the movement of individuals and their alleles from one population to another, 
potentially changing allele frequencies in both the old and the new population
mitochondria: (singular: mitochondrion) the cellular organelles responsible for carrying out 
cellular respiration, resulting in the production of ATP, the cell’s primary energy-carrying 
molecule
mitosis: the period of the cell cycle at which the duplicated chromosomes are separated into 
identical nuclei; includes prophase, prometaphase, metaphase, anaphase, and telophase
mitotic phase: the period of the cell cycle when duplicated chromosomes are distributed into 
two nuclei, and the cytoplasmic contents are divided; includes mitosis and cytokinesis
mitotic spindle: the microtubule apparatus that orchestrates the movement of chromosomes 
during mitosis
XIV Return to Table of Contents
modern synthesis: the overarching evolutionary paradigm that took shape by the 1940s and is 
generally accepted today
molecule: a chemical structure consisting of at least two atoms held together by a chemical bond
monohybrid: the result of a cross between two true-breeding parents that express different traits 
for only one characteristic
monomers: the single subunits, or building blocks that make up polymers
monosaccharide: a single unit or monomer of carbohydrates
monosomy: an otherwise diploid genotype in which one chromosome is missing
mutation: a permanent variation in the nucleotide sequence of a genome
N
natural selection: the greater relative survival and reproduction of individuals in a population 
that have favorable heritable traits, leading to evolutionary change
neutron: a particle with no charge that resides in the nucleus of an atom; has a mass of 1
nitrogenous base: a nitrogen-containing molecule that acts as a base; often referring to one of 
the purine or pyrimidine components of nucleic acids
noncompetitive inhibition: a general mechanism of enzyme activity regulation in which a 
regulatory molecule binds to a site other than the active site and prevents the active site from 
binding the substrate; thus, the inhibitor molecule does not compete with the substrate for the 
active site; allosteric inhibition is a form of noncompetitive inhibition
nondisjunction: the failure of synapsed homologs to completely separate and migrate to 
separate poles during the first cell division of meiosis
nonpolar covalent bond: a type of covalent bond that forms between atoms when electrons are 
shared equally between atoms, resulting in no regions with partial charges as in polar covalent 
bonds
nuclear envelope: the double-membrane structure that constitutes the outermost portion of the 
nucleus
nuclear pores: control the passage of ions, molecules, and RNA between the nucleus and the 
cytoplasm
nucleic acid: a biological macromolecule that carries the genetic information of a cell and 
carries instructions for the functioning of the cell
nucleoid: a central region in a prokaryotic cell where DNA is found
nucleolus: the darkly staining body within the nucleus that is responsible for assembling 
ribosomal subunits
nucleotide: monomers of nucleic acids. Consist of a five-carbon sugar, phosphate group, and 
nitrogenous base
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XV
nucleus: (chemistry) the dense center of an atom made up of protons and (except in the case of a 
hydrogen atom) neutrons
nucleus: the cell organelle that houses the cell’s DNA and directs the synthesis of ribosomes and 
proteins
O
oil: an unsaturated fat that is a liquid at room temperature
Okazaki fragments: the DNA fragments that are synthesized in short stretches on the lagging 
strand
orbital: an area where an electron is most likely to be found its
organ system: the higher level of organization that consists of functionally related organs
organ: a structure formed of tissues operating together to perform a common function
organelle: a membrane-bound compartment or sac within a cell
organic molecule: any carbon-containing liquid, solid, or gas
organism: an individual living entity
osmolarity: the total amount of substances dissolved in a specific amount of solution
osmosis: the transport of water through a semipermeable membrane from an area of high-water 
concentration to an area of low-water concentration across a membrane. Water also moves from 
an area of low solutes to an area of high solutes until equilibrium is met.
oxidation reaction: a chemical reaction that consists of an electron being donated by an atom
oxidative phosphorylation: production of ATP using the process of chemiosmosis in the presence 
of oxygen
oxidative phosphorylation: the production of ATP by the transfer of electrons down the 
electron transport chain to create a proton gradient that is used by ATP synthase to add 
phosphate groups to ADP molecules
P
P: the parental generation in a cross
passive transport: a method of transporting material that does not require energy
pedigree: to chart used to study inheritance patterns of genetic characteristics
peer-reviewed article: a scientific report that is reviewed by a scientist’s colleagues before 
publication
peptide bond: a covalent bond that exists between the amino group of one amino acid and the 
carboxyl group of a second amino acid
XVI Return to Table of Contents
periodic table of elements: an organizational chart of elements, indicating the atomic number 
and mass number of each element; also provides key information about the properties of 
elements
peripheral protein: protein at the plasma membrane's surface either on its exterior or interior 
side
peroxisome: a small, round organelle that contains hydrogen peroxide, oxidizes fatty acids and 
amino acids and detoxifies many poisons
pH scale: a scale ranging from 0 to 14 that measures the approximate concentration of hydrogen 
ions of a substance
phagocytosis: a process that takes macromolecules that the cell needs from the extracellular 
fluid; a variation of endocytosis
phenotype: the observable traits expressed by an organism
phospholipid: a major constituent of the membranes of cells; composed of two fatty acids and a 
phosphate group attached to the glycerol backbone
phosphorylation: addition of a high-energy phosphate to a molecule, usually a metabolic 
intermediate, a protein, or ADP
photoautotroph: an organism capable of synthesizing its own food molecules (storing energy), 
using the energy of light
photon: a distinct quantity or “packet” of light energy
photorespiration: when oxygen is in a higher concentration than carbon dioxide, rubisco will 
fix oxygen to RuBP
photosynthesis: a multi-step chemical reaction that requires light energy, carbon dioxide, and 
water and produces sugar and oxygen
photosystem: a group of proteins, chlorophyll, and other pigments that are used in the light dependent reactions of photosynthesis to absorb light energy and convert it into chemical energy
phylogenetic tree: a diagram showing the evolutionary relationships among biological species 
based on similarities and differences in genetic or physical traits or both
pigment: a molecule that is capable of absorbing light energy
pinocytosis: a process that takes solutes that the cell needs from the extracellular fluid; a 
variation of endocytosis
plasma membrane: a phospholipid bilayer with embedded (integral) or attached (peripheral) 
proteins that separates the internal contents of the cell from its surrounding environment
plasmodesma: (plural: plasmodesmata) a channel that passes between the cell walls of adjacent 
plant cells, connects their cytoplasm and allows materials to be transported from cell to cell
pleiotropy: describes when one gene controls two or more different characteristics
point mutation: occur when a single nucleotide is permanently changed in the DNA sequence
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XVII
polar covalent bond: a type of covalent bond in which electrons are pulled toward one atom and 
away from another, resulting in slightly positive and slightly negative charged regions of the 
molecule
polygenic inheritance: describes when each gene that an individual inherits has a small additive 
effect on the overall phenotype
polymers: larger molecules that are formed by combining monomers using covalent bonds
polypeptide chain: a long chain of amino acids linked by peptide bonds
polyploid: an individual with an incorrect number of chromosome sets
polysaccharide: a long chain of monosaccharides; may be branched or unbranched
population genetics: the study of how selective forces change the allele frequencies in a 
population over time
population: all individuals within a species living within a specific area
potential energy: the type of energy that refers to the potential to do work
predictions: statements that describe what should happen if the hypothesis is supported
primary structure: a linear sequence of amino acids in a protein
products: the substances that are formed at the end of a chemical reaction (usually on the right 
side of a chemical equation
prokaryote: a unicellular organism that lacks a nucleus or any other membrane-bound organelle
prometaphase: the stage of mitosis during which mitotic spindle fibers attach to kinetochores
promoter: a sequence on DNA to which RNA polymerase and associated factors bind and 
initiate transcription
prophase: the stage of mitosis during which chromosomes condense and the mitotic spindle 
begins to form
protein: a biological macromolecule composed of one or more chains of amino acids
proton: a positively charged particle that resides in the nucleus of an atom; has a mass of 1 and a 
charge of +1
pseudoscience: claims or beliefs that are portrayed as scientific fact but cannot be evaluated 
using the scientific method
Punnett square: a visual representation of a cross between two individuals in which the gametes 
of each individual are denoted along the top and side of a grid, respectively, and the possible 
zygotic genotypes are recombined at each box in the grid
XVIII Return to Table of Contents
Q
qualitative data: data that is descriptive
quantitative data: data that is numerical
quaternary structure: association of different polypeptide chains in a protein
R
radioactive isotope: an isotope that spontaneously emits particles or energy to form a more 
stable element
reactants: the substances used at the beginning of a chemical reaction (usually on the left side 
of a chemical equation)
reactivity: the ability of elements to combine and chemically bond with each other
receptor-mediated endocytosis: a variant of endocytosis that involves the use of specific 
binding proteins in the plasma membrane for specific molecules or particles
recessive: describes a trait whose expression is masked by another trait when the alleles for both 
traits are present in an individual
redox reaction: a chemical reaction that consists of the coupling of an oxidation reaction and a 
reduction reaction
reduction reaction: a chemical reaction that consists of an electron being gained by an atom
replication fork: the Y-shaped structure formed during the initiation of replication
ribonucleic acid (RNA): a single-stranded polymer of nucleotides that are involved in protein 
synthesis
ribose: a five-carbon sugar molecule with hydroxyl group in the 2' position; the sugar 
component of RNA nucleotides
ribosomal RNA (rRNA): ribosomal RNA; molecules of RNA that combine to form part of the 
ribosome
RNA polymerase: an enzyme that synthesizes an RNA strand from a DNA template strand
RNA primase: an enzyme that can base pair with the DNA and add a short stretch of RNA 
nucleotides called a primer. The primer is required to initiate DNA replication
RNA primer: short sequence of RNA nucleotides which DNA polymerase can add DNA 
nucleotides to
rough endoplasmic reticulum (RER): the region of the endoplasmic reticulum that is studded 
with ribosomes and engages in protein modification
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XIX
S
S phase: the second, or synthesis phase, of interphase during which DNA replication occurs
saturated fatty acid: a long-chain hydrocarbon with single covalent bonds in the carbon chain; the 
number of hydrogen atoms attached to the carbon skeleton is maximized
science: the knowledge that covers general truths or the operation of general laws, mainly when 
acquired and tested by the scientific method
scientific method: a method of research with defined steps that include experiments and careful 
observation
scientific theory: a thoroughly tested and confirmed explanation for observations or phenomena
second law of thermodynamics: states that every energy transfer or transformation increases the 
universe's entropy
secondary structure: structure that proteins form by hydrogen bonding between the oxygen 
atom of one amino acid, and the hydrogen attached to the nitrogen atom of another amino acid
selectively permeable: the characteristic of a membrane that allows some substances through 
but not others
semiconservative replication: the method used to replicate DNA in which the double-stranded 
molecule is separated and each strand acts as a template for a new strand to be synthesized, so 
the resulting DNA molecules are composed of one new strand of nucleotides and one old strand 
of nucleotides
septum: a partition formed between two bacterial daughter cells
sexual reproduction: requires that two different gametes (egg and sperm) come together to form 
a zygote
simple diffusion: a process where solutes move directly through the membrane from an area of 
high concentration to an area of low concentration until equilibrium is met
sister chromatids: two identical chromosomes attached to one another at a location called the 
centromere region
smooth endoplasmic reticulum (SER): the region of the endoplasmic reticulum that has few or 
no ribosomes on its cytoplasmic surface and synthesizes carbohydrates, lipids, and steroid 
hormones; detoxifies chemicals like pesticides, preservatives, medications, and environmental 
pollutants, and stores calcium ions
solute: a substance being dissolved in another to form a solution
solution: a homogeneous mixture made of two or more components
solvent: a substance capable of dissolving another substance
somatic cell: all the cells of a multicellular organism except the gamete-forming cells
speciation: a formation of a new species
sperm: the male gamete; a haploid cell
XX Return to Table of Contents
spliceosome: a structure composed of various proteins and other molecules, which attaches to 
the mRNA transcript and “splices” or cuts out the non-coding, introns
splicing: the process of removing introns and reconnecting exons in a pre-mRNA
standardized variable: variables that must be kept consistent otherwise they can affect the 
outcome or results of the experiment
starch: a storage carbohydrate in plants
start codon: the AUG (or, rarely GUG) on an mRNA from which translation begins; always 
specifies methionine
steroid: a type of lipid composed of four fused hydrocarbon rings
stoma: the opening that regulates gas exchange and water regulation between leaves and the 
environment; plural: stomata
stop codon: one of the three mRNA codons that specifies termination of translation
stroma: the fluid-filled space surrounding the grana inside a chloroplast where the Calvin cycle 
reactions of photosynthesis take place
substrate-level phosphorylation: production of ATP from ADP using the excess energy from a 
chemical reaction and a phosphate group from a reactant
substrate: a reactant that binds to a specific enzyme
surface tension: the cohesive force at the surface of a body of liquid that prevents the molecules 
from separating
sympatric speciation: a speciation that occurs in the same geographic space 
T
telomerase: an enzyme that contains a catalytic part and an inbuilt RNA template; it functions to 
maintain telomeres at chromosome ends
telomere: the DNA at the end of linear chromosomes
telophase: the stage of mitosis during which chromosomes arrive at opposite poles, decondense, 
and are surrounded by new nuclear envelopes
temperature: a measure of molecular motion
tertiary structure: a protein's three-dimensional conformation, including interactions between 
secondary structural elements
tetrad: two duplicated homologous chromosomes (four chromatids) bound together by 
chiasmata during prophase I
theory: a thoroughly tested and confirmed explanation for observations or phenomena
thermodynamics: the science of the relationships between heat, energy, and work
Access for free at https://openstax.org/ XXI
thylakoid: a disc-shaped membranous structure inside a chloroplast where the light-dependent 
reactions of photosynthesis take place using chlorophyll embedded in the membranes
tight junction: a firm seal between two adjacent animal cells created by protein adherence
tissue: a group of similar cells carrying out the same function
tonicity: the amount of solute in a solution
trait: a variation in an inherited characteristic
trans-fat: a form of unsaturated fat with the hydrogen atoms neighboring the double bond across 
from each other rather than on the same side of the double bond
transcription bubble: the region of locally unwound DNA that allows for transcription of 
mRNA
transcription: the process of making mRNA from DNA
transfer RNA (tRNA): transfer RNA; an RNA molecule that contains a specific three nucleotide anticodon sequence to pair with the mRNA codon and also binds to a specific amino 
acid
translation: process of making a protein from the nucleotide sequence code of an mRNA 
transcript
translocation: the process by which one segment of a chromosome dissociates and reattaches to 
a different, nonhomologous chromosome
triglyceride: a fat molecule; consists of three fatty acids linked to a glycerol molecule
trisomy: an otherwise diploid genotype in which one entire chromosome is duplicated
unsaturated fatty acid: a long-chain hydrocarbon that has one or more than one double bonds in 
the hydrocarbon chain
V
vacuole: a membrane-bound sac, somewhat larger than a vesicle, that functions in cellular 
storage and transport
valence shell: the outermost electron shell
variants: genotypes or phenotype that deviate from the wild type
variation: the variety of alleles in a population
vesicle: a small, membrane-bound sac that functions in cellular storage and transport; its 
membrane is capable of fusing with the plasma membrane and the membranes of the 
endoplasmic reticulum and Golgi apparatus
vestigial structure: a physical structure present in an organism but that has no apparent function 
and appears to be from a functional structure in a distant ancestor
XXII Return to Table of Contents
W
wavelength: the distance between consecutive points of a wave
waxes: a type of lipid made up of a hydrocarbon chain with an alcohol (–OH) group and a fatty 
acid
wild type: the most commonly occurring genotype or phenotype for a given characteristic found 
in a population
X
X (sex)-linked: pattern of inheritance in which an allele is carried on the X chromosome of the 
23rd pair
X-linked dominant inheritance: pattern of dominant inheritance that corresponds to a gene on 
the X chromosome of the 23rd pair
X-linked recessive inheritance: pattern of recessive inheritance that corresponds to a gene on 
the X chromosome of the 23rd pair
Z
zygote: a fertilized egg produced when a sperm and egg fus
